JAFAR You're the one that I need You're nimble, stealthy, skilled Do you want to continue abusing those skills Stealing bits of bread and worthless baubles Or do you want to make a name for yourself And do something that would make any mother proud You have the profile of a prince With a physique that matches Beneath the dirt and patches You are a diamond in the rough I say we work together since You're braver then we two are We're just as shocked as you are That you're a diamond in the rough ALADDIN Hey, I'm no diamond in the rough JAFAR Under the filth and the fleas there are gifts that you've been neglecting And truth be told you are not quite the guy that we were expecting And though you might need finesse, and perhaps some disinfecting You'll be the one who succeeds when the lamp of their needs collecting ALADDIN Uh, I dunno guys, I've got a funny feeling about this. I better just be on my way JAFAR Take one step and die you brainless miscreant! IAGO Happy place! JAFAR Apologies What I meant to say is You just don't know how swell you are IAGO You just don't know how swell you are! JAFAR So far the only hitch is IAGO There's just an itty bitty hitch JAFAR You're an embarrassment of riches IAGO Embarrassing too true! JAFAR You are the diamond in the rough IAGO Let's all rejoice the spooky voice said you're the diamond in the Rooooooough! JAFAR Look here's the diamond in the IAGO Three cheers, the diamond in the JAFAR & IAGO We found the diamond in the rough! ALADDIN You better find somebody else! JAFAR There is nobody else IAGO Talk about the girl JAFAR Oh Then, of course there's Princess Jasmine It's clear she took a shine to you But, let me be frank With no cash in the bank You'll never win her heart It just tears me apart To see her slip right through your fingers ALADDIN Which way is this cave of yours? JAFAR That a boy! Go Through! You Might be a bum But you're one Of noble spirit IAGO It's just a cave that might eat you alive No need to fear it! ALADDIN Well it's a risk that I might have to take JAFAR & IAGO We're glad to hear it JAFAR So please no missteps or blunders IAGO Cue the Cave of Wonders! JAFAR & IAGO We've waited long enough CAVE OF WONDERS Who disturbs my slumber ALADDIN Uh, it is I, Aladdin CAVE OF WONDERS You are the diamond in the rough. The one whose worth lies deep within. You may enter ALADDIN I don't believe it. My mother always said if I only applied myself - If I only believed! JAFAR We don't have time for self-discovery! Fetch me the lamp. Now! ALADDIN Wish me luck! JAFAR Luck! Goodbye you diamond in the IAGO Please try you diamond in the JAFAR & IAGO Don't die you diamond in the rough JAFAR At last!
Jafar: Jasmine Prince Ali, yes it is he, but not as you know him Read my lips and come to grips with reality Yes, meet a blast from your past Whose lies were too good to last Say hello to your precious Prince Ali! So Ali turns out to be merely Aladdin Just a con, need I go on, take it from me His personality flaws give me adequate cause To send him packing on a one-way trip so his prospects take a terminal dip His assets frozen, the venue chosen is in the ends of the Earth Salaam, ex-prince Ali!
GENIE (Spoken) Salām, and good evening to you worthy friends. Welcome to the fabled city of Agrabah. City of flying carpets, soaring heroes, famous love ballads and more glitz and glamour than any other fictional city in the world (Sung) Oh I come from a land, from a faraway place Where the caravan camels roam Where it's flat and immense And the heat is intense It's barbaric, but hey, it's home When the winds from the East And the suns from the West And the sand in the glass is right Come on down, stop on by Hop a carpet and fly To another Arabian night (Spoken) And of course, you know what Agrabah's famous for? This magical lamp. Don't be fooled by its "commonplace" appearance, like so many things, it is not what's on the outside but what's on the inside that counts. Woah, got a little deep there for a second. This lamp put Agrabah on the map. You've never been? Well... we can fix that! (Sung) Follow me to a place Where incredible feats Are routine every hour or so Where enchantment runs rampant It's wild in the streets Open Sesame, here we go See the dervishes dance In ridiculous pants Then romance to your heart's delight Come on down GENIE & COMPANY Come on in Let the magic begin It's another Arabian Night Arabian Nights... Like Arabian Days... More often than not Are hotter than hot GENIE In a lot of good ways GENIE & COMPANY Arabian Nights... 'Neath Arabian moons... A fool off his guard Could fall and fall hard Out there on the dunes COMPANY> In that magical place In that mystical land There's a Genie inside every jar He'll do all your bidding Your wish, his command GENIE It's demeaning, but hey there you are COMPANY> Unbelievable, yes An unethical mess Nonetheless, no one's very contrived You come here and you've Come to a land where any mountain can move A land of high intrigue with tricky logistics By prophets and Mystics GENIE And I've got statistics to prove COMPANY> Arabian Nights Arabian Nights GENIE, spoken Agrabah Come for the hummus Stay for the floor-show Even the poor people Look fabulous! And everyone here has a minor in dance And now, for the softer side of Agrabah COMPANY> Arabian Nights... Arabian Nights GENIE And of course, you must watch Your step here in Agrabah For danger lurks around Every corner and ugly bad guys too COMPANY> Arabian Nights GENIE It's a city where a penniless nobody Can turn out to be... A noble somebody COMPANY Arabian Nights GENIE It's a place where a princess Would give up her crown for true love But her father, the Sultan, is a stickler For the Ancient ways And our hero's pals are as Thick as thieves "Adorable"... but thieves Oh, and did I mention... Everybody sings GENIE & COMPANY Arabian Nights Like Arabian Days More often than not Are hotter than hot In a lot of good ways Arabian Nights 'Neath Arabian moons A fool off his guard Could fall and fall hard Out there on the dunes COMPANY Arabian Nights... Arabian Nights... Arabian Nights... Arabian Nights... Arabian Nights...
Genie: It's a big, bright, beautiful future Thank your lucky stars you're alive You got someone special to talk to A friend that you can trust for life You've been on your own with no family ties But those solo days are done You'll be two of a kind Spending quality time Together as father and son Buildin' model ships Takin' fishin' trips Workin' hand in hand Painting the palace, mowin' the sand First at ten to go With your daddy-o Once you break the ice You can postulate paternal advice See, you're travelling at the speed of life That's the theory of relatives! It's a fine, fantabulous future I see fruit on the family tree You'll be great as a grumpy ol' grandpa Bouncing babies on your knee! You can fall asleep on the comfy couch After playin' one-on-one Reamin' back-to-back Betcha wallop the Shaq Together as father and son Cassim: May be a bumpy ride Aladdin: We'll make it side by side Genie: Good afternoon, I'll be your travel guide Move over, Aladdin Make room for dad! You got a whole new shoulder to cry on Take a chance now, give it a spin You've had chums for palin' around with But you never had a friend like him Put your checkered past behind you now No more living on the run Face the big, bright, beautiful future Together together, together, together as father and son
KASSIM Good pals, blood brothers Me and three others Babkak, Omar, Aladdin, Kassim BABKAK, OMAR, ALADDIN, KASSIM Four friends, none closer Get mad? Heck no, sir! Not us, four-strong, a permanent team Four guys out poundin' the pavements of Agrabah Poor guys with one Arabian dream To stay this lazy And play like crazy Babkak, Omar, Aladdin, Kassim True friends, no phonies Me and my cronies ENSEMBLE> Babkak, Omar, Aladdin, Kassim BABKAK, OMAR, ALADDIN, KASSIM Four bums, none better Not one go-getter KASSIM Unmotivated in the extreme BABKAK Folks say, "Hey, go earn a living in Agrabah!” OMAR “Grow up, go earn the city's esteem!" BABKAK, OMAR, ALADDIN, KASSIM We say, "Tough noogie! No way! Let's boogie!" ENSEMBLE> Babkak, Omar, Aladdin, Kassim BABKAK, OMAR, KASSIM Four guys out passing the turban in Agrabah ENSEMBLE> For letting off some musical steam BABKAK, OMAR, ALADDIN, KASSIM That's our finale 'Kay guys, let's blow this alley ALL Babkak, Omar, Aladdin and Howzat so far, not bad'n it's Eight eyes with one impertinent gleam Babkak, Omar, Aladdin, Kassim Babkak, Omar, Aladdin, Kassim
Peddler: Oh, I come from a land, from a faraway place Where the caravan camels roam Where it's flat and immense And the heat is intense It's barbaric, but, hey, it's home When the wind's from the East And the sun's from the West And the sand in the glass is right Come on down Stop on by Hop a carpet and fly To another Arabian night Arabian nights Like Arabian days More often than not Are hotter than hot In a lot of good ways Arabian nights 'Neath Arabian moons A fool off his guard Could fall and fall hard Out there on the dunes
Aladdin: Riffraff! Street rat! I don't buy that! If only they'd look closer Would they see a poor boy? No, siree They'd find out there's so much more to me
Jasmine: I know you're scared and I know what you've been through Look in my eyes Can't you see I'm frightened too? So let's take one step at a time I won't give up That's one thing I swear will be true For it's said to be wise: "Keep your eyes on the prize" and I've got my eyes on you It's hard to trust When you've been misunderstood It's starting now We'll be treated like we should So let's take this ride till it's true I won't give up That's one thing I swear will be true And I won't give in I'm stronger than they ever knew Don't try to run 'Cause I'll just be there when you do For it's said to be wise: "Keep your eyes on the prize" And I've got my eyes on you I won't give up That's one thing I swear will be true For it's said to be wise: "Keep your eyes on the prize" And I've got my eyes on you
Thieves: Congratulations, bub, you've joined the club And everybody here agrees We got the finest blend of nearly-honest men Welcome to the forty thieves! A fraternity of thugs that you can trust There's nothing up our eighty sleeves Got lotsa grub to share Pull up an easy chair Welcome to the forty thieves! Now you get to lie and cheat Never have to brush your teeth But we always aim to please Care for one another You'll never miss your mother Iago: Oh, I love you guys Thieves: Schemin' up a scam Out on the lam Takin' whatever we please And if you like to lurk You're gonna love this work Welcome to the forty thieves! Welcome to the forty thieves! Cassim: Together we're the perfect team Larceny is in the genes Dare to share the family dream Iago: Live a life of leisure Countin' all your treasure Thieves: As an honorary member of the gang That no one alive ever leaves Ya gotta snatch and sneak Or else your future's bleak We got a lifetime contract that you're bound to keep You wanna save your skin You better fit right in Wel-wel-welcome to the Wel-wel-welcome to the Forty thieves!
Aladdin: I can show you the world Shining, shimmering, splendid Tell me, princess, now when did You last let your heart decide I can open your eyes Take you wonder by wonder Over, sideways and under On a magic carpet ride A whole new world A new fantastic point of view No one to tell us no Or where to go Or say we're only dreaming Jasmine: A whole new world A dazzling place I never knew But now from way up here It's crystal clear That now I'm in a whole new world with you Aladdin: Now I'm in a whole new world with you Jasmine: Unbelievable sights Indescribable feeling Soaring, tumbling, freewheeling Through an endless diamond sky Jasmine: A whole new world Aladdin: Don't you dare close your eyes Jasmine: A hundred thousand things to see Aladdin: Hold your breath; it gets better Jasmine: I'm like a shooting star I've come so far I can't go back to where I used to be Aladdin: A whole new world Jasmine: Every turn a surprise Aladdin: With new horizons to pursue Jasmine: Every moment red-letter Aladdin: and Jasmine: I'll chase them anywhere There's time to spare Let me share this whole new world with you Aladdin: A whole new world Jasmine: A whole new world Aladdin: and Jasmine: Aladdin: That's where we'll be Jasmine: That's where we'll be Aladdin: A thrilling chase Jasmine: A wondrous place Aladdin: and Jasmine: For you and me
ALADDIN (Spoken) I'm going to become somebody. I don't know how exactly, but I am. I have to... somehow (Sung) Proud of your boy I'll make you proud of your boy Believe me, bad as I've been, Ma You're in for a pleasant surprise I've wasted time I've wasted me So say I'm slow for my age A late bloomer Okay, I agree That I've been one rotten kid Some son, some pride and some joy But I'll get over these lousin' up Messin' up, screwin' up times You'll see, Ma, now comes the better part Someone's gonna make good Cross his stupid heart Make good and finally make you Proud of your boy Tell me that I've been a louse and loafer You won't get a fight here, no ma'am Say I'm a goldbrick, a goof-off, no good But that couldn't be all that I am Water flows under the bridge Let it pass, let it go There's no good reason that you should believe me Not yet, I know, but Someday and soon I'll make you proud of your boy Though I can't make myself taller Or smarter or handsome or wise I'll do my best, what else can I do? Since I wasn't born perfect like Dad or you Mom, I will try to Try hard to make you Proud of your boy
ALADDIN (spoken): Have you ever imagined what it would be like to take off? Never look back? JASMINE (spoken): Only every hour of every day ALADDIN (spoken): What's stopping us? ALADDIN We'll join a caravan tonight Count on the stars to be our guides We'll simply vanish out of sight Go where the desert road decides There won't be any obligations JASMINE Or fathers to obey ALADDIN Cause we'll be a million miles away Leave everything behind When you choose to lose yourself Who knows what you might find And once the journey's done You'll have some faith in me After a million miles or so We might feel like we're free JASMINE Maybe we'll travel on the sea ALADDIN I'll tend the sails and you can steer JASMINE Watch the waves roll on endlessly ALADDIN And the horizon disappear JASMINE We'll leave all thoughts about the future 'till some future day BOTH Cause we'll be a million miles away Leave everything behind When you choose to lose yourself Who knows what you might find And once the journey's done It won't seem quite so far After a million miles or so We'll find out who we are JASMINE Follow wherever the wind starts blowing ALADDIN A million miles away The kind of life people dream of knowing JASMINE A million miles away BOTH We'll never turn back we'll just keep on going Vanishing from the view Becoming someone new We'll be a million miles away Leave everything behind When you choose to lose yourself Who knows what you might find And once the journey's done We'll have no need to roam After a million miles or so We might find out we're home After a million miles or so We might find out we're home
Peddler: Arabian nights Follow me to a place where incredible feats Are routine every hour or so Where enchantment runs rampant Yes, wild in the streets Open sesame, here we go Arabian nights Like Arabian days They tease and excite Take off and take flight They shock and amaze Arabian nights Like Arabian days More often than not Are hotter than hot In a lot of good ways Pack your shield, pack your sword You won't ever get bored Though get beaten or gored you might Come on down, stop on by Hop a carpet and fly To another Arabian night
Genie: Make way for Prince Ali Say hey, it's Prince Ali Hey, clear the way in the old Bazaar Hey, you, let us through It's a brand new star Oh, come! Be the first on your block to meet his eye Make way, here he comes Ring bells! Bang the drums! You're gonna love this guy Prince Ali! Fabulous he, Ali Ababwa Show some respect Boy, genuflect! Down on one knee Now try your best to stay calm Brush up your Friday salaam Then come and meet his spectacular coterie! Prince Ali! Mighty is he, Ali Ababwa Strong as ten regular men, definitely He's faced the galloping hordes A hundred bad guys with swords Who sent those goons to their lords? Why, Prince Ali Fellas, he's got He's got seventy-five golden camels Woo, uh, huh, now the ladies, what he got? Purple peacocks, he's got fifty-three Uh, huh, uh, huh, uh, huh When it comes to exotic-type mammals Everybody, help me out! He's got a zoo I'm telling you, it's a world-class menagerie Prince Ali! Handsome is he, Ali Ababwa That physique! How can I speak Weak in my knees (yummy, boy!) So get on out in that square Adjust your veil and prepare To gawk and grovel and stare at Prince Ali He's got ninety-five white Persian monkeys (He's got the monkeys, a bunch of monkeys) And to view them he charges no fee (He's generous, so generous) He's got ten thousand servants and flunkies (Proud to work for him) They bow to his whim, love serving him They're just lousy with loyalty to Ali! Prince Ali! Prince A- We're waiting for you! We're not going till you go You can do it! There it is! Prince Ali! Amorous he, Ali Ababwa Heard your princess was hot! Where is she? And that, good people, is why He got all cute and dropped by With sixty elephants, llamas galore (For real?) With his bears and lions A brass band and more (What?) With his forty fakirs, his cooks, his bakers His birds that warble on key Make way For Prince Ali!
Peddler: Oh, imagine a land, it's a faraway place Where the caravan camels roam Where you wander among every culture and tongue It's chaotic, but, hey, it's home When the wind's from the East, and the sun's from the West And the sand in the glass is right Come on down, stop on by Hop a carpet and fly To another Arabian night As you wind through the streets at the fabled bazaars With the cardamom-cluttered stalls You can smell every spice While you haggle the price Of the silks and the satin shawls Oh, the music that plays as you move through a maze In the haze of your pure delight You are caught in a dance You are lost in the trance Of another Arabian night Arabian nights Like Arabian days More often than not are hotter than hot In a lot of good ways Arabian nights Like Arabian dreams This mystical land of magic and sand Is more than it seems There's a road that may lead you To good or to greed through The power your wishing commands Let the darkness unfold or find fortunes untold Well, your destiny lies in your hands Arabian nights Like Arabian days They seem to excite, take off and take flight To shock and amaze Arabian nights 'Neath Arabian moons A fool off his guard could fall and fall hard Out there on the dunes
Aladdin: I can show you the world Shining, shimmering, splendid Tell me, princess, now when did You last let your heart decide I can open your eyes Take you wonder by wonder Over, sideways and under On a magic carpet ride A whole new world A new fantastic point of view No one to tell us no Or where to go Or say we're only dreaming Jasmine: A whole new world A dazzling place I never knew But when I'm way up here It's crystal clear That now I'm in a whole new world with you Aladdin: Now I'm in a whole new world with you Jasmine: Unbelievable sights Indescribable feeling Soaring, tumbling, freewheeling Through an endless diamond sky A whole new world Aladdin: Don't you dare close your eyes Jasmine: A hundred thousand things to see Aladdin: Hold your breath; it gets better Jasmine: I'm like a shooting star I've come so far I can't go back to where I used to be Aladdin: A whole new world Jasmine: Every turn a surprise Aladdin: With new horizons to pursue Jasmine: Every moment red-letter Aladdin and Jasmine: I'll chase them anywhere There's time to spare Let me share this whole new world with you Aladdin: A whole new world Jasmine: A whole new world Aladdin: That's where we'll be Jasmine: That's where we'll be Aladdin: A thrilling chase Jasmine: A wondrous place Aladdin and Jasmine: For you and me
GENIE As a teenie Genie I would dare to dream I'd be given freedom free and clear So forgive me if I sing Or make a whole big thing But I just can't maintain my cool veneer You don't mind if I squeal, do you? ALADDIN Be my guest! GENIE Oooooh! I can't believe this is actually happening! ALADDIN You save me Then I'll save you I won't bail a 23 Skidoo Say ain't it great to know somebody's got your back GENIE I'll free you in one second I wanna sing this one little verse That I owe you That you owe me Means we're Ollie Ollie Oxen Free! Say ain't it great to know that somebody's got your back! BOTH Ooooooh! GENIE I always knew that I could trust you kid BOTH Ooooooh! It's quid pro-quo then it's quo-pro-quid! GENIE I knew you'd see that fair is fair ALADDIN Cross my heart and double pinky swear BOTH Say ain't it great to know that somebody's got your back Say ain't it great to know that somebody's got your back! GENIE No, after you Sure I'll take it BABKAK, OMAR, KASSIM Hello? BABKAK, OMAR, ALADDIN, KASSIM Alright! Ooooooh! Without Genie, we don't stand a chance! Ooooooh! This is the start of a fine bromance! Our bond will last like Mutt and Jeff's OMG the guys are BFFs! Say ain't it great to know that somebody's got your back! It's give and take! It's tit for tat! We gonna divvy things up I down with that GENIE Because kaboom kablam Comes easily It's part of Genie Genie-ology! BABKAK, OMAR, ALADDIN, KASSIM We don't do tricks Like Genies do But we got your back And sing back up too! Sayin' ain't it great to know that somebody's got your Ain't it great to know that somebody's got your Ain't it great to know that somebody's got your Baaaack! ALL Got your back
JASMINE A princess must say this: "A princess must marry a total stranger", it's absurd! Suitors talk of love but it's an act Merely meant to throw me How could someone love me when in fact They don't know me They want my royal treasure When all is said and done It's time for a desperate measure So I wonder Why shouldn't I fly so far from here? I know the girl I might become here Sad and confined and always locked behind these palace walls! ATTENDANT #1, spoken I don't know princess, for someone like you the outside world might be kind of overwhelming JASMINE, spoken Is that a promise? ATTENDANT #2, spoken I think it would do her some good JASMINE, spoken You do? ATTENDANT #2, spoken Honey I've never seen somebody who needed to get out more ATTENDANTS Told to show devotion everyday And not second guess it JASMINE If a new emotion comes my way ATTENDANTS You suppress it JASMINE What would be your suggestion? ATTENDANTS Stand on your own two feet And ask why a certain question keeps repeating JASMINE Why shouldn't I fly so far from here? I know the girl I might become here Follow your heart or you might end up cold and callous ALL Love comes to those who go and find it If you've a dream then stand behind it JASMINE Maybe there's more beyond these palace walls What if I dared What if I tried Am I prepared for what's outside Why shouldn't I fly so far from here? Something awaits beyond these palace walls ALL Something waits beyond these palace walls
ALADDIN "Riffraff" "Street rat" I don't buy that If only they'd look closer Would they see a poor boy? No, sirree They'd find out There's so much more to me...
Aladdin: Riffraff! Street rat! I don't buy that! If only they'd look closer Would they see a poor boy? No, siree They'd find out there's so much more to me
Genie: Well, Ali Baba had them forty thieves Scheherazade had a thousand tales But, master, you're in luck 'cause up your sleeves You got a brand of magic never fails You got some power in your corner now Some heavy ammunition in your camp You got some punch, pizazz, yahoo and how See all you gotta do is rub that lamp And I'll say Mr. Aladdin, sir What will your pleasure be? Let me take your order Jot it down You ain't never had a friend like me Life is your restaurant And I'm your maitre d' Come on whisper what it is you want You ain't never had a friend like me Yes sir, we pride ourselves on service You're the boss The king, the shah Say what you wish It's yours! True dish How about a little more baklava? Have some of column "A" Try all of column "B" I'm in the mood to help you, dude You ain't never had a friend like me Can your friends do this Can your friends do that Can your friends pull this out their little hat Can your friends go, poof Hey, looky here Can your friends go, Abracadabra, let her rip And then make the sucker disappear So don't you sit there slack-jawed, buggy-eyed I'm here to answer all your midnight prayers You got me bona fide certified You got a genie for your charge d'affaires I got a powerful urge to help you out So what's your wish? I really wanna know You got a list that's three miles long, no doubt Well, all you gotta do is rub like so Mr. Aladdin, sir, have a wish or two or three I'm on the job, you big nabob You ain't never had a friend, never had a friend You ain't never had a friend, never had a friend You ain't never had a friend like me You ain't never had a friend like me!
ALADDIN You must feel trapped inside these walls We'll run away, just you and me Why not escape as evening falls? There's a whole world you've yet to see JASMINE If I go with you, will it be safe? ALADDIN Sure, do you trust me? JASMINE What did you just say? ALADDIN Do you trust me? JASMINE I'm not sure why, but yes ALADDIN I can show you the world Shining, shimmering, splendid Tell me, princess, now when did You last let your heart decide? I can open your eyes Take you wonder by wonder Over, sideways and under On a magic carpet ride A whole new world A new fantastic point of view No one to tell us no Or where to go Or say we're only dreaming JASMINE A whole new world A dazzling place I never knew But when I'm way up here It's crystal clear That now I'm in a whole new world with you ALADDIN Now I'm in a whole new world with you JASMINE Unbelievable sights Indescribable feeling Soaring, tumbling, freewheeling Through an endless diamond sky A whole new world ALADDIN Don't you dare close your eyes JASMINE A hundred thousand things to see ALADDIN Hold your breath, it gets better JASMINE I'm like a shooting star I've come so far I can't go back to where I used to be ALADDIN A whole new world JASMINE Every turn a surprise ALADDIN With new horizons to pursue JASMINE Every moment, red-letter BOTH I'll chase them anywhere There's time to spare Let me share this whole new world with you JASMINE A whole new world ALADDIN Don't you dare close your eyes JASMINE A hundred thousand things to see ALADDIN Hold your breath, it gets better JASMINE I'm like a shooting star I've come so far I can't go back to where I used to be ALADDIN A whole new world JASMINE Every turn a surprise ALADDIN With new horizons to pursue JASMINE Every moment gets better BOTH I'll chase them anywhere There's time to spare Let me share this whole new world with you ALADDIN A whole new world JASMINE A whole new world ALADDIN That's where we'll be JASMINE That's where we'll be ALADDIN A thrilling chase JASMINE A wondrous place BOTH For you and me
Jasmine: Here comes a wave meant to wash me away A tide that is taking me under Swallowing sand, left with nothing to say My voice drowned out in the thunder But I won't cry And I won't start to crumble Whenever they try to shut me or cut me down I won't be silenced You can't keep me quiet Won't tremble when you try it All I know is I won't go speechless 'Cause I'll breathe when they try to suffocate me Don't you underestimate me 'Cause I know that I won't go speechless Written in stone, every rule, every word Centuries old and unbending Stay in your place, better seen and not heard Well, now that story's ending 'Cause I, I cannot start to crumble So come on and try Try to shut me and cut me down I won't be silenced You can't keep me quiet Won't tremble when you try it All I know is I won't go speechless Speechless! Let the storm in I cannot be broken No, I won't live unspoken 'Cause I know that I won't go speechless Try to lock me in this cage I won't just lay me down and die I will take these broken wings And watch me burn across the sky Hear the echo saying I won't be silenced Though you wanna see me tremble when you try it All I know is I won't go speechless Speechless! 'Cause I'll breathe when they try to suffocate me Don't you underestimate me 'Cause I know that I won't go speechless All I know is I won't go speechless Speechless!
GENIE (Scat fill) Can you give me a "bada-yada-yada"? (Aladdin repeat) Good! Scotty-wop (Aladdin repeat) Everybody! Bibbidi-Bobbidi-Boo (Audience repeat) (Scat fill) Hit it! Wah-wah-wah! (Oh my!) Wah-wah-wah! (Oh no!) Wah-wah wah! Well Ali Baba had them forty thieves Scheherazade had a thousand tales But master you in luck 'cause up your sleeves You got a brand of magic never fails You got some power in your corner now Some heavy ammunition in your camp You got some punch, pizzazz, yahoo and how See all you gotta do is rub that lamp And I'll say: Mister Aladdin, sir What will your pleasure be? Let me take your order Jot it down You ain't never had a friend like me No no no Life is your restaurant And I'm your maitre d' C'mon whisper what it is you want You ain't never had a friend like me Yes sir We pride ourselves on service You're the boss The king, the shah Say what you wish It's yours! True dish How about a little more Baklava? There it is C'mon fellas, help me out Have some of column "A" Try all of column "B" I'm in the mood to help you dude You ain't never had a friend like me Now watch me sell it Wah-wah-wah! (Oh my!) Wah-wah-wah! (Oh no!) Wah-wah wah! Can your friends do this? Can your friends do that? Can your friends pull this out their little hat? Can your friends go, poof? Well, looky here Can your friends go, Abracadabra, let 'er rip And then make the sucker disappear? So doncha sit there slack jawed, buggy eyed I'm here to answer all your midday prayers You got me bona fide, certified You got a genie for your chare d'affaires I got a powerful urge to help you out So what-cha wish? I really wanna know You got a list that's three miles long, no doubt Well, all you gotta do is rub like so C'mon, yes Mister Aladdin, sir, have a wish or two or three I'm on the job, you big nabob You ain't never had a friend like me Can your friends do this? No really, can they? You're welcome Or maybe, our lucky contestant Would like to wish for a talent of fame Welcome to, Dancing With The Scimitars Grab Aladdin by the hand Swing him 'round 'till he can't stand Chicken in the baskets Barrel in a tree Never had a friend like me I would like to bring the house down a little bit Sing a few old classics Couple of favourites of mine I'll get back to you in a second Thank you! Tale as old as time True as it can be Barely even friends Beauty and the... Look at this stuff Isn't it neat? Wouldn't you think my collections complete? Wouldn't you think I'm the genie who has everything? Babadabop bop Badop bop ba-dop Babadabop bop Badop bop bop And you'll never hear the wolf cry To the blue corn moon For whether we are white or copper skinned I want adventure in the great wide Ever just the same Ever a surprise Though he's sitting here Watch Al disappear Right before your eyes Yes! Can your friends do this? Can your friends do that? Can your friends do tap? Can your friends do this? Can your friends do that? Can your friends go, Abracadabra, let 'er rip Gimme a doggy bag, I'm takin' it home Mister Aladdin, sir, have a wish or two or three I'm on the job, you big nabob You ain't never had a friend, never had a friend You ain't never had a friend, never had a friend You ain't never had a friend like me You ain't never had a friend like me
Genie: There's a party here in Agrabah There's excitement in the air People pouring in from near and far 'Cause Jasmine and Aladdin are gonna have a weddin' There's a party here in Agrabah Everybody will be there So if you're a pauper or a shah Do somethin' with your hair You mustn't wear an outfit that's naughty A turban that's unraveling just won't do No earrings that are tasteless or gaudy You're gonna look gorgeous when I get through There's a party here in Agrabah So I'm going to paint the town If you want to see what colors are Follow me around Aladdin's gettin' married, and it's gonna be The wedding of the century My buddy's gettin' married, and you're gonna see Just how much I can do You've heard of your safari bar mitzvahs You've all been to a luau, a sweet sixteen Well, none of them compare to what this is The food'll be disgusting, by evening you'll be busting There's a party here in Agrabah And it's got us all aglow If a street rat could've come so far Maybe I could do it Sure, there's nothin' to it! There's a party here in Agrabah But we're not sure that we'll go For although the bride is lah-dee-dah The groom is awfully low And now we take you down to the palace Where everyone has celebrated all night long Without Jafar and all of his malice Everybody's happy What could possibly go wrong? Thieves: There's a party here in Agrabah And we're gonna rob 'em blind Cassim: While they're all munching caviar Create a small disturbance, I'll sneak up from behind Iago: There's a party here in Agrabah And the loot is pourin' in I like this wedding stuff so far Maybe if I'm pleasant, I'll get to keep a present Genie: We've ordered just a few tasteful flowers The valets will carefully park for you The bridesmaids have been dressing for hours! Girls, you look just lovely and so grown-up, too There's a party here in Agrabah Guests are filling up the room But there's something missing...yes, ah ha! Sultan: Where is the groom?
Genie: Make way for Prince Ali Say hey, it's Prince Ali Hey, clear the way in the old Bazaar Hey you, let us through It's a bright new star Oh, come! Be the first on your block to meet his eye! Make way, here he comes Ring bells! Bang the drums! You're gonna love this guy Prince Ali! Fabulous he, Ali Ababwa Genuflect, show some respect Down on one knee Now, try your best to stay calm Brush up your Sunday salaam Then come and meet his spectacular coterie Prince Ali! Mighty is he, Ali Ababwa Strong as ten regular men, definitely He faced the galloping hordes A hundred bad guys with swords Who sent those goons to their lords? Why, Prince Ali He's got seventy-five golden camels Purple peacocks, he's got fifty-three When it comes to exotic-type mammals Has he got a zoo? I'm telling you, it's a world-class menagerie Prince Ali! Handsome is he, Ali Ababwa That physique! How can I speak Weak at the knee Well, get on out in that square Adjust your veil and prepare To gawk and grovel and stare at Prince Ali He's got ninety-five white Persian monkeys (He's got the monkeys, let's see the monkeys) And to view them he charges no fee (He's generous, so generous) He's got slaves, he's got servants and flunkies (Proud to work for him) They bow to his whim, love serving him They're just lousy with loyalty to Ali! Prince Ali! Prince Ali! Amorous he, Ali Ababwa Heard your princess was a sight lovely to see And that, good people, is why He got dolled up and dropped by With sixty elephants, llamas galore With his bears and lions A brass band and more With his forty fakirs, his cooks, his bakers His birds that warble on key Make way For Prince Ali!
ALADDIN Gotta keep One jump ahead of the breadline One swing ahead of the sword I steal only what I can't afford And that's everything One jump ahead of the lawmen That's all and that's no joke These guys don't appreciate I'm broke GUARDS Riffraff Street rat Scoundrel Take that ALADDIN Just a little snack, guys GUARDS Rip him open, take it back, guys ALADDIN I can take a hint, gotta face the facts I could use a friend or two ALL True LADIES Oh, it's sad, Aladdin's hit the bottom He's become a one man rise in crime I'd blame parents, except he hasn't got 'em ALADDIN Gotta eat to live, gotta steal to eat Tell you all about it when I got the time One jump ahead of the slowpokes One skip ahead of my doom Next time gonna use a nom de plume One jump ahead of the hitmen One hit ahead of the flock I think I'll take a stroll around the block TRADERS Stop, thief Vandal Outrage Scandal ALADDIN Let's not be too hasty WOMAN Still I think he's rather tasty ALADDIN Gotta eat to live, gotta steal to eat Otherwise we'd get along ALL Wrong ALADDIN One jump ahead of the hoofbeats GUARDS Vandal ALADDIN One hop ahead of the hump GUARDS Street rat ALADDIN One trick ahead of disaster GUARDS Scoundrel ALADDIN They're quick, but I'm much faster GUARDS Take that ALADDIN Here goes, better throw my hand in Wish me happy landin' all I gotta do is jump GUARDS Don't let him get away ALADDIN, spoken Sometimes it's just way too easy
Aladdin: Gotta keep one jump ahead of the breadline One swing ahead of the sword I steal only what I can't afford (And that's everything!) One jump ahead of the lawmen That's all, and that's no joke These guys don't appreciate I'm broke Crowd: Riffraff! Street rat! Scoundrel! Aladdin: Take that! Try a different tack, guys Crowd: Rip him open! Round the back, guys Aladdin: I can take a hint, gotta face the facts Could really use a friend or two Ladies: Huh? Oh, it's sad Aladdin's hit the bottom He's become a one-man rise in crime I'd blame parents except he hasn't got 'em Aladdin: Gotta eat to live, gotta steal to eat Tell you all about it when I got the time! One jump ahead of the slowpokes One skip ahead of my doom Next time gonna use a nom de plume One jump ahead of the hitmen One hit ahead of the flock I think I'll take a stroll around the block Crowd: Stop, thief! Vandal! Abu! Scandal! Aladdin: Let's not be too hasty Lady: Still I think he's rather tasty Aladdin: Gotta eat to live, gotta steal to eat Otherwise we'd get along Aladdin: One jump ahead of the hoofbeats One hop ahead of the hump One trick ahead of disaster They're quick, but I'm much faster Here goes, better throw my hand in Wish me happy landin' All I gotta do is jump
OMAR (spoken): What are we going to do? Storm the palace? KASSIM (spoken): Yes! Storm the palace! OMAR (spoken): Wait, I didn't mean that! BABKAK (spoken): That's the spirit! KASSIM (spoken): Who's up for a little high adventure? Okay first things first, we're going to need weapons OMAR (spoken): Weapons!? Oh geez, couldn't we just, uh, send a strongly worded letter? BABKAK Seriously? KASSIM Maybe I can convince these guys to work out a trade BABKAK Convince those guys, my lord and master (That's what I'm doing Babkak) Well, do it faster, let's be gone KASSIM Everyone choose a weapon OMAR Oh I should really be going BABKAK In wasting time we court disaster BABKAK & KASSIM Pick up that sword and strap it on OMAR See I hate weapons because-- This thing is awesome! KASSIM Fate blows her kiss Chills your heart Takes your hand BABKAK Fate feels like this Play your part This was planned ALL And lo, before you know You grab your horse, you grab your gear Your moment's now, your moment's here It's time for high, high, high adventure You're off and riding, sabre flashing Your banner high, your molars gnashing You feel so dashing on a high, high, high adventure Get set to give some guy a thrashing 'Cause high adventure's in the air To the palace! To the palace! To the palace! KASSIM There's high adventure in the air, guys Someone's out there, guys, someone bad OMAR Are we there yet? (No!) Are we there yet? (No!) Are we there yet? (We're not moving!) He's got a damsel in despair, guys Heck, that's not fair, guys, and I'm mad (Hit it Omar, yeah) BABKAK Fate blows her kiss Winks her eye Plots her scheme ALL Plots it for Babkak, Omar, and Kassim And so We three will go Until it's through Until it ends Here comes Aladdin's only friends Off on a high, high, high adventure To confrontations so exciting They're playing music while we're fighting Sctatching and biting on a High, high, high adventure Feel that adrenaline igniting 'Cause high adventure's in the air WOMEN Hi Hi Hi ALL Adventure! Heigh-ho, the stallions are stampeding With Allah's wisdom ever leading (My finger's bleeding!) Well, that's High, high, high adventure What we've collectively been needing Is high adventure in the air Hark! Something calls like a dream from afar Calls out to Babkak, Kassim and Omar It's - wait! - the voice of fate It calls to me, it calls to you And to Aladdin's motley crew It's time for high, high, high adventure Danger to danger we go flying Completely unafraid of dying Omar, stop crying, this is High, high, high adventure There's no ignoring or denying The kind of thrills that it's supplying And the effect's electrifying When high adventure's in the air
Jasmine: You showed me the world When I was all locked up inside You reached out your hand And took me on a magic carpet ride One look at your smile And I could see the light Shining everywhere People like you don't come out of thin air Aladdin: Oh, Jasmine You don't understand There is so much that you don't see Just think, if you can What growing up had to be like for me Your father's a man Who taught you who you are Mine was never there So how can you say I don't come out of thin air? Aladdin: There's so much I want to know Jasmine: You've got the chance to learn Aladdin: If it means I'd have to go Jasmine: I'll be right here when you return Our wedding can wait Aladdin: I love you Jasmine: I think it's worth this small delay Aladdin: Maybe you're right Jasmine: And won't it be great To have your father see our wedding day? Aladdin: I've waited so long Jasmine: It isn't too late Aladdin: To learn the truth Aladdin and Jasmine: And now at last, we can finally say Jasmine: Your father is really there Aladdin: There's so much that we might share Jasmine: And you'll finally learn Aladdin and Jasmine: You don't come out of thin air
GENIE As a teenie Genie I would dare to dream I'd be given freedom free and clear So forgive me if I sing Or make a whole big thing But I just can't maintain my cool veneer You don't mind if I squeal, do you? ALADDIN Be my guest! GENIE Oooooh! I can't believe this is actually happening! ALADDIN You save me Then I'll save you I won't bail a 23 Skidoo Say ain't it great to know somebody's got your back GENIE I'll free you in one second I wanna sing this one little verse That I owe you That you owe me Means we're Ollie Ollie Oxen Free! Say ain't it great to know that somebody's got your back! BOTH Ooooooh! GENIE I always knew that I could trust you kid BOTH Ooooooh! It's quid pro-quo then it's quo-pro-quid! GENIE I knew you'd see that fair is fair ALADDIN Cross my heart and double pinky swear BOTH Say ain't it great to know that somebody's got your back Say ain't it great to know that somebody's got your back! GENIE No, after you Sure I'll take it BABKAK, OMAR, KASSIM Hello? BABKAK, OMAR, ALADDIN, KASSIM Alright! Ooooooh! Without Genie, we don't stand a chance! Ooooooh! This is the start of a fine bromance! Our bond will last like Mutt and Jeff's OMG the guys are BFFs! Say ain't it great to know that somebody's got your back! It's give and take! It's tit for tat! We gonna divvy things up I down with that GENIE Because kaboom kablam Comes easily It's part of Genie Genie-ology! BABKAK, OMAR, ALADDIN, KASSIM We don't do tricks Like Genies do But we got your back And sing back up too! Sayin' ain't it great to know that somebody's got your Ain't it great to know that somebody's got your Ain't it great to know that somebody's got your Baaaack! ALL Got your back
Iago: That's it! I've had it! I hate to be dramatic But it's time for me to fly the coop Terrific! Fine! I'm drawin' the line Before I wind up in a parrot soup! I was a fool to let you run the show I'm cuttin' ya loose, pal! Look out below! Arrividerci! C'est la vie! Hope all goes well! I'm lookin' out for me! Okay! I'm little Been playin' second fiddle And I don't get no respect I turn the other cheek But this busted beak Is the only thanks that I get! I never found a friend that I can trust They promise caviar And leave me eatin' dust! That's some reward for loyalty From here on in I'm lookin' out for me! Oh, I don't need nobody else I'll never fail I'll cover my own tail I can take care of myself! You know, it just don't pay To give a hoot I'm givin' all my heart What do I get? The boot! I'm through wit' dat I'm flappin' free From here on in I'm lookin' out for me!
KASSIM Hail, your attention I crave Oh ye people of Agrabah This is your lucky day OMAR Hail, high and low, great and small Lucky people of Agrabah Someone's coming to call Take it away Babkak BABKAK Someone who tamed the Cyclops Then fought forty thieves single hand He's richer than Croesus He goes where he pleases And this time he's chosen your land BABKAK, OMAR AND KASSIM So here he is now with his band ENSEMBLE> Make way for Prince Ali Say hey! Hey! Hey! For Prince Ali Say hey! GENIE Hey! Clear the way in the old bazaar Hey you! Let us through! It's a bright new star! Oh Come! Be the first on your block To meet his eye! Make way Here he comes! Ring bells! Bang the drums! Are you gonna love this guy! Make Way! (Make Way!) Make Way! (Make Way!) Make Way! Prince Ali! Fabulous he! Ali Ababwa Genuflect, show some respect Down on one knee! Now, try your best to stay calm Brush up your Sunday salaam Then come and meet his spectacular coterie Prince Ali! Mighty is he! Ali Ababwa Strong as ten regular men, definitely! He once slew seventy Turks Mustaches, sabres, real jerks! Who gave those bad guys the works? ENSEMBLE> Why, Prince Ali Prince, Prince Ali Prince Ali Prince, Prince Ali Prince Ali WOMAN He's got seventy-five golden camels Purple peacocks He's got fifty-three GENIE When it comes to exotic-type mammals Has he got a zoo? I'm telling you It's a world-class menagerie Wow! Prince Ali! Wonderful he Ali Ababwa He's essayed quite a parade For you to see So get on out in that street Got someone I wantcha to meet Come on, start kissing the feet Of Prince Ali! Sing hey, hey! Hey, hey! Hey to Prince Ali Sing hey, hey! Hey, hey! Hey to Prince Ali Sounding good fellas Hit me one more time Over the top There's no question this Ali's impressive Though his entourage may be excessive All those elephants at once can quite unnerve one Still, the guy gives a parade new meaning And the sight of all those peacocks preening He's a prince without a peer And we deserve one! There's no question this Ali's alluring Never ordinary! Never boring! Everything about the man just plain impresses He's a winner, he's a whizz A Wonder! He's about to pull my heart asunder And I absolutely love the way he dresses He's got ninety-five white Persian monkeys (He's got the monkey's, lets see the monkeys) And to view them he charges no fee (He's generous, so generous) He's got slaves, he's got servants and flunkies (Proud to work for him) They bow to his whim (Love serving him) They're just lousy with loyalty to Ali! Prince Ali! Prince Ali! Amorous he! Ali Ababwa Heard your Princess was a sight Lovely to see And that, good people, is why He got dolled up and dropped by With sixty elephants, llama's galore With his bears and lions A brass band and more With his forty fakirs His cooks, his bakers His birds that warble on key Make way for Prince Ali! (Prince Ali) Say hey to Prince Ali! (Prince Ali) Say hey, hey, hey to Prince Ali!
SULTAN Hail! Your attention I pray Oh, ye people of Agrabah! This is our lucky day! SULTAN (spoken): My noble subjects, Princess Jasmine has chosen Prince Ali to be her husband and our next Sultan! SULTAN Go, cry from the highest mountain tops Rejoice, raise your voice Pull out all the stops! At last, we've a prince who should be glorified! Ring bells, throw rice Bang drums, bang them twice! Ali's gonna wed his bride...! ENSEMBLE> Prince Ali, yes it is he Ali Ababwa Favourite son, second to none Obviously SULTAN Who made Her Majesty swoon Who had her changing her tune And not a moment too soon ENSEMBLE> He's Prince Ali!
ALADDIN Tell the truth, lose the princess Keep the princess, live a lie I know that I was a louse and a loafer You won't get a fight, I agree I was a goldbrick, a goof-off, no good So, how did this happen to me? Proud of your boy I hope you're proud of your boy Cause I don't feel any taller or smarter Or handsome or wise And now, I know what I have to do How can I be a prince when it isn't true? So, I will try to try hard to make you Proud of Your Boy
Genie: I parachuted down into the Taj Mahal I rollerbladed all along the great Great Wall! I even made the famous Leaning Tower fall But who was with me through it all? Nobody! The Moscow Circus hired me to fly trapeze On Mount Olympus won a race with Hercules It's easy when you're chased by killer bees Who said "gesundheit" when I sneezed So now I'm home Home again with you You chase the clouds away Whenever I am blue (You're always blue) And the pyramids I highly recommend There is nothing in the world quite like a friend Slept like a babe in Bombay on a bed of nails Moroccans loved my daring dance of seven veils I single-handedly I even saved the whales No one was there to hear my tales! In Acapulco joined a Mariachi band I rode the ragin' rapids down the Rio Grande Flew in an air balloon, but when I tried to land Nobody laughed, or lent a hand Without you, the Amazon is just a trickle Without you, the Sahara's not so hot Without you, Niagara Falls is just a leaky faucet And the QEII is just some yacht Now that I'm home Home again it's clear All I ever wanted Seems to be right here I've traveled east and west And now I'm back again And there's nothing in the world quite like a friend Aladdin: There's nothing in the world Jasmine: Nothing in the whole wide world Aladdin, Genie, and Jasmine: There is nothing in the world quite like a friend Genie:Nothin' in the whole wide world!
Aladdin: Riffraff! Street rat! Would they think that If they look much closer Still, I can't play a prince here No, siree Gotta tell the truth I can't pretend Even if it means this dream will end Even if she walks away from me
Jafar: I must admit, your parlor tricks are amusing I bet you've got a bunny under your hat Now here's your chance to get the best of me Hope your hand is hot C'mon, clown, let's see what you've got You try to slam me with your hardest stuff But your double whammy isn't up to snuff I'll set the record straight You're simply out of date You're only second rate! You think your cat's a meanie, but your tiger's tame You've got a lot to learn about the genie game So for your education I'll reiterate You're only second rate! Men cower at the power in my pinky My thumb is number one on every list But if you're not convinced that I'm invincible Put me to the test I'd love to lay this rivalry to rest Go ahead and zap me with the big surprise Snap me in a trap, cut me down to size I'll make a great escape It's just a piece of cake You're only second rate! You know, your hocus-pocus isn't tough enough And your mumbo-jumbo doesn't measure up Let me pontificate upon your sorry state You're only second rate! Zaba-caba-dabra! Granny's gonna grab ya! Alakazam-da-mus And this thing's bigger than the both of us So spare me your tremendous scare You look horrendous in your underwear And I can hardly wait to discombobulate I'll send ya back and packing in a shipping crate You'd make a better living with a spinning plate You're only second rate!
Sa'luk: I remember a time When crime was sublime There was plenty of loot in the lair We'd plunder and pillage And ransack a village With nary a worry or care Then along came this king With his soft-hearted dream But he ratted us out in the end So rally the troops We were meant to regroup And return to our roots once again! Are you in or out? Gotta know without a doubt I'm the one you need for a dirty deed I'm the best; success is guaranteed Are you men or mice? Take a slice of my advice You want a fearless leader One that's strong and stout? Better vote for me Are you in or out? Thieves: We used to be smart, yes Horrendously heartless In a ravaging raid we were rough We knew what we had To be blissfully bad Then Cassim brought this sensitive stuff And we strayed from the path Of our rigorous wrath Now we're taking a bath in the dust But we'll reclaim our winnings Our humble beginnings In turmoil and torture we trust Sa'luk: Are you in or out? Double-crossers or devout? Put your faith in me; pretty soon you'll see I'm the prince of generosity Are you foe or friend? Here's the path I recommend You want a ride to fame? I've got the fastest route What's it gonna be? Are you in or out? Thieves: We'll go robbing in all the right places From Agrabah dunes to Paris Imagine the fear on their faces When we drop by for cookies and tea Sa'luk: Are you in or out? If you're with me, give a shout I'll lead you all the way into the glory days Thieves: We'll begin a life of crime that pays Are you out or in? Make your choice now: sink or swim Sa'luk: You can stick with me Or stay behind and pout What's it gonna be? Consider carefully Are you in or out?
Jasmine: Another satin gown Another rose bouquet Another king, another ring, another boring day I'm gonna sound the call From Mecca to Siam I'm more than a peacock princess I am! Iago: Yeah, right! Jasmine: I am! Iago: Not quite! Jasmine: I smile and I wave I wave and then I smile I sit on one more camel's hump For one more bumpy mile I'm not just one more silk In Daddy's caravan I'm more than a peacock princess I am Iago: I believe she is Jasmine: I can find a cure I can help the poor I could soar if they'd give me half a chance When will they get a clue? There's so much that I can do Iago: You can knock 'em flat Jasmine: Be a diplomat Iago: It's apparent the girl's got talent Jasmine: Send the Sultan A royal telegram I'm more than a peacock princess Iago:You're more than a peacock princess Jasmine & Iago I'm/You're more than a peacock princess Jasmine: I am Iago: You are Jasmine: By far Iago: A star Jasmine: I am
Iago: Forget about that guy Forget about the way you fell into his eyes Forget about his charms Forget about the way he held you in his arms Walking on air's obnoxious The thrills, the chills Will make you nauseous And you'll never get enough Just forget about love Forget about romance Forget about the way your heart begins to dance Then you feel the blush When he's spouting out some sentimental mush Love really is revolting It's even worse than when you're molting Enough of this fluff Just forget about love Jasmine: I had almost forgotten the way it felt When he held out his hand for mine My heart all a-flutter Iago: Oh, how I shudder Jasmine: The first time we kissed Iago: It won't be missed Forget about his touch Jasmine: I can't forget about his touch Iago: In the scheme of things It doesn't matter much Jasmine: It matters so much Iago: You're better on your own A meal becomes a banquet When you eat alone Jasmine: Hmm-mm-mm-mm Jasmine and Iago: Love's filled with compromises Iago: And don't you hate those big surprises? Jasmine: A cozy rendez-vous Iago: Oh, please! Jasmine: Candlelight for two Iago: Oh, geez! Jasmine: Look, you're calling my bluff, I can't Iago: Just Aladdin and Jasmine: Forget about love! Jasmine: I can't forget about my heart Aladdin: I can't forget about my heart Jasmine: And how it felt to fall for you right from the start Aladdin: I'm still falling Jasmine: Whatever we may do Aladdin: Whatever we may do Jasmine: You are here for me, and I'll be there for you Aladdin: I'll be there Aladdin and Jasmine: To wish, to want, to wander To find the sun through rain and thunder Aladdin and Jasmine: A cozy rendez-vous Jasmine: Yes, please! Aladdin: Candlelight for two Iago: Oh, geez! Enough is enough! Aladdin and Jasmine We can't forget about love!
Aladdin: Gotta keep one jump ahead of the breadline One swing ahead of the sword I steal only what I can't afford (That's everything!) One jump ahead of the lawmen That's all, and that's no joke These guys don't appreciate I'm broke Crowd: Riffraff! Street rat! Scoundrel! Take that! Aladdin: Just a little snack, guys Crowd: Rip him open, take it back, guys Aladdin: I can take a hint, gotta face the facts You're my only friend, Abu! Crowd: Who? Ladies: Oh, it's sad Aladdin's hit the bottom He's become a one-man rise in crime I'd blame parents except he hasn't got 'em Aladdin: Gotta eat to live, gotta steal to eat Tell you all about it when I got the time! One jump ahead of the slowpokes One skip ahead of my doom Next time gonna use a nom de plume One jump ahead of the hitmen One hit ahead of the flock I think I'll take a stroll around the block Crowd: Stop, thief! Vandal! Outrage! Scandal! Aladdin: Let's not be too hasty Lady: Still I think he's rather tasty Aladdin: Gotta eat to live, gotta steal to eat Otherwise we'd get along Aladdin: One jump ahead of the hoofbeats (Vandal!) One hop ahead of the hump (Streetrat!) One trick ahead of disaster (Scandal!) They're quick, but I'm much faster (Take that!) Here goes, better throw my hand in Wish me happy landin' All I gotta do is jump
Genie: Here I go, woo! Back up! Watch out! You done wound me up 'Bout to show you what I'm working with Well, Ali Baba, he had them forty thieves Scheherazade had a thousand tales But, master, you're in luck because up your sleeves You got a brand of magic never fails You got some power in your corner now Heavy ammunition in your camp You got some punch, pizazz, yahoo and how All you gotta do is rub that lamp And then I'll say Mr. - (man, what's your name) Whatever, what will your pleasure be Let me take your order I'll jot it down You ain't never had a friend like me Life is your restaurant And I'm your maitre d' Come whisper to me whatever it is you want You ain't never had a friend like me We pride ourselves on service You the boss The king, the shah Say what you wish It's yours! True dish How about a little more baklava? Have some of column "A" Try all of column "B" I'm in the mood to help you, dude You ain't never had a friend like me Oh, it's the big part Watch out, it's the big part, oh Can your friends do this? Can your friends do that? Can your friends pull this outta of their little hat? Can your friends go - I'm the genie of the lamp I can sing, rap, dance if you give me a chance, oh Don't sit there buggy-eyed I'm here to answer all your midday prayers You got me bona fide certified Got a genie for your charge d'affaires I got a powerful urge to help you out So what's your wish? I really wanna know You got a list that's three miles long, no doubt All you gotta do is rub like so Mr. (Aladdin), yes, one wish or two or three Well, I'm on the job, you big nabob You ain't never had a friend, never had a friend You ain't never had a friend, never had a friend You ain't never (ever) Had a (had a) Friend (friend) Like (like) me You ain't never had a friend like me
GASTON You've been dreaming, just one dream Nearly all your life Hoping, scheming, just one theme: Will you be a wife? Will you be some he-man's property? Good news! That he-man's me! This equation, girl plus man Doesn't help just you On occasion, women can Have their uses too Mainly to extend the family tree Pumpkin, extend with me! We'll be raising sons galore BELLE Inconceivable! GASTON Each built six foot four! BELLE Unbelievable! GASTON Each stuffed with ev'ry Gaston gene! BELLE I'm not hearing this! GASTON You'll be keeping house with pride! BELLE Just incredible! GASTON Oh so gratified BELLE So unweddable! GASTON That you are a part of this idyllic scene (spoken) Picture this: A rustic hunting lodge, my latest kill roasting over the fire, my little wife massaging my feet, while the little Ones play on the floor with the dogs. We'll have six or seven! BELLE, spoken Dogs? GASTON, spoken No, Belle! Strapping boys...like me! BELLE, spoken Imagine that! GASTON I can see that we will share All that love implies We shall be a perfect pair Rather like my thighs You are face to face with destiny! All roads lead to... The best things in life are... All's well that ends with me! Escape me? There's no way Certain as "Do, Re," Belle, when you marry.... (spoken) So Belle, what would it be? Is it "yes", or is it "oh, yes"? BELLE, spoken I...I just don't deserve you! GASTON, spoken Who does? (sung) Me! BELLE, spoken But thanks for asking
How does a moment last forever How can a story never die It is love we must hold onto Never easy, but we try Sometimes our happiness is captured Somehow our time and place stand still Love lives on inside our hearts And always will Minutes turn to hours Days to years, then gone But when all else has been forgotten Still our song lives on Maybe some moments weren't so perfect Maybe some memories not so sweet But we have to know some bad times For our lives are incomplete Then when the shadows overtake us Just when we feel all hope is gone We'll hear our song, and know once more Our love lives on How does a moment last forever How does our happiness endure Through the darkest of our troubles Love is beauty, love is pure Love pays no mind to desolation It flows like a river through the soul Protects, perceives and perseveres And makes us whole Minutes turn to hours Days to years, then gone But when all else has been forgotten Still our song lives on How does a moment last forever When our song lives on
Lumiere: To each his own, my friend You know how to get me stressed But when it comes to making Christmas special Cogsworth: I'm a cut above the rest Lumiere: If you could see things clearly You would say that I've been blessed Cogsworth: You can't hold a candle to my timing Lumiere: Ahh! I'm a cut above the rest Belle: You belong side by side You should never be apart Cause when you're both together You're really twice as smart Cogsworth, spoken: Twice as smart - she does have a point Lumiere: Yes, well, two heads are better than one Cogsworth: I'd say that as a team We have got to be the best Lumiere: Now we've found something We both agree on We're a cut above the rest Lumiere and Cogsworth: There's no doubt that as a team We two are the very best Everyone who knows us must agree We're a cut above the rest Lumiere, Cogsworth: and Belle: There's not doubt that as a team Belle: You two are the very best Everyone who knows you must agree Lumiere and Cogsworth: We're a cut... Belle: A cut above... Lumiere and Cogsworth: Above the rest!
Belle There's something sweet And almost kind But he was mean and he was coarse and unrefined But now he's dear, and so unsure I wonder why I didn't see it there before Madame de la Grande Bouche, spoken Come along dearie Let's get you off those wet things Beast She glanced this way I thought I saw And when we touched she didn't shudder at my paw No it can't be, I'll just ignore But then she's never looked at me that way before (spoken) Belle, I have something to show you But first, you have to close your eyes It's a surprise! Belle, spoken May I open them? Beast, spoken Alright, alright. Now! Belle, spoken I can't believe it! I've never seen so many books in my whole life! Beast, spoken You like it? Belle, spoken It's wonderful! Beast, spoken It's yours! Belle New and a bit alarming Who'd have ever thought that this could be? True that he's no Prince Charming But there's something in him that I simply didn't see (spoken) Oh, this is one of my favorites! It's "King Arthur." Have you ever read it? Beast, spoken No Belle, spoken You don't know what you're missing I'd love to read this again Wait...you can read this first Beast, spoken No, that's alright Belle, spoken No, really, you read it Beast, spoken Oh, no, you... Belle, spoken No, you Beast, spoken No! I can't... Belle, spoken You never learned to read? Beast, spoken Only a little, and long ago Belle, spoken Well, it just so happens that this is the perfect book to read aloud. Come here, sit by me Lumiere Well, who'd have thought? Mrs. Potts Well, bless my soul Cogsworth Well, who'd have known? Mrs. Potts Well, who indeed? Lumiere And who'd have guessed they'd come together on their own? Mrs. Potts It's so peculiar All We'll wait and see A few days more There may be something there that wasn't there before Cogsworth Perhaps there's something there That wasn't there before Chip, spoken What? Mrs. Potts There may be something there that wasn't there before Chip, spoken What's there, Mama? Mrs. Potts, spoken Ssh. I'll tell you when you're older Come along now. Let's give them some privacy... Chip, spoken Mama? Mrs. Potts, spoken Yes, Chip Chip, spoken Will I ever get to be a boy again? Mrs. Potts, spoken I hope so Chip, spoken When will I know? Mrs. Potts, spoken Soon. If it's to be. It will be very soon now. Come along, son Belle, spoken Knowing now, that this was indeed the legendary sword called "Excalibur," Arthur tried to pull it from the stone. He tried Once to no avail. He tried a second time, but still, he could not pull it out. Then, for the third time, Arthur drew forth the Sword... Beast, spoken So that must mean he's the king! Belle, spoken Wait and see Beast, spoken I never knew books could do that Belle, spoken Do what? Beast, spoken Take me away from this place, make me forget for a little while Belle, spoken Forget? Beast, spoken Who I...What I am... Belle, spoken We have something in common, you know Beast, spoken What is that? Belle, spoken In the town where I come from, the people think I'm odd Beast, spoken You? Belle, spoken So, I know how it feels to be...different. And I know how lonely that can be For the third time, Arthur drew forth the sword, and there arose from the people a great shout. Arthur is king Beast, spoken I told you so...
BELLE, spoken Papa, do you think I'm...odd? MAURICE, spoken My daughter odd? Where did you get an idea like that? BELLE, spoken I don't know It's just that, well, people talk MAURICE, spoken They talk about me, too No, we're not odd, its true No fam'ly could be saner Except one uncle who...well, maybe let that pass In all you say or do You couldn't make it plainer You are your mother's daughter; therefore you are class BELLE So I should just accept I'm simply not like them MAURICE They are the common herd And you could take my word You are unique, creme de la creme No matter what you do I'm on your side And if my point of view Is somewhat misty-eyed There's nothing clearer in my life Than what I wish and feel for you And that's a lot No matter what BELLE No matter what they say You make me proud I love the funny way You stand out from the crowd MAURICE It's my intention my invention Shows the world out there one day Just what we've got BELLE No matter what MAURICE Now some may say all fathers just exaggerate BELLE That every daughter's great? MAURICE You are! BELLE And every daughter tends to say her father's tops MAURICE She pulls out all the stops To praise him BOTH And quite rightly! MAURICE No matter what the pain We've come this far I pray that you remain Exactly as you are This really is a case of father knowing best BELLE And daughter too! MAURICE You're never strange BELLE Don't ever change BOTH You’re all I've got No matter what
Gaston When a man like me is thwarted And denied his honeymoon Lefou When the pretty thing he's courted Refuses to swoon Gaston Then the time has come for a murky plan Lefou For which he turns to a murky man All To find that fiend where better than At the Maison des Lunes? Gaston You'll be strapping up an inmate Lefou Very tightly Gaston Very soon But we won't bring him in late Lefou Your check-in time's noon D'Arque How sad Maurice is not too well Gaston Prepare a five-star padded cell! All And book him in for a long, long spell At the Maison des Lunes Gaston Do I make myself entirely clear? Lefou It's the simplest deal of your whole foul career Gaston Put Maurice away and she'll be here in moments Lefou In a dreadful state Gaston She'll capitulate to me D'Arque Oh! Oh! Oh, I love incarceration I could lock up a platoon Gaston We'll apply your inclination To a mad old buffon Gaston & Lefou Then wave one bachelor goodbye Gaston She'll be my bride Lefou She'd rather die Than have her daddy ossify D'Arque The time's opportune All So book the church, raise glasses high To the Maison des Lunes!
Tale as old as time True as it can be Barely even friends Then somebody bends Unexpectedly Just a little change Small to say the least Both a little scared Neither one prepared Beauty and the Beast Ever just the same Ever a surprise Ever as before And ever just as sure As the sun will rise Ever just the same And ever a surprise, yeah Ever as before And ever just as sure As the sun will rise Oh! Oh! Oh, oh! Tale as old as time Tune as old as song Bittersweet and strange Finding you can change Learning you were wrong Certain as the sun (Certain as the sun) Rising in the east Tale as old as time Song as old as rhyme Beauty and the Beast Tale as old as time Song as old as rhyme Beauty and the Beast Beauty and the Beast
Forte: The quickest way to break your heart Make you depressed and ill Is to get tangled up inside The side effects could kill All passion is a waste of time A deadly game pour vous I am your friend, your cher ami I wouldn't lie to you If you must love someone, may I suggest You love yourself! Just think it through You'll never leave and you will find You'll get more rest You'll always feel as good as new Your freedom is the most Important thing, my friend You must be strong, you mustn't bend Don't talk for hours Don't send flowers Don't write poems Don't sing songs and dance Beneath the stars That shine above Don't fall in love As soon as your heart rules your head Your life is not your own It's hell when someone's always there It's bliss to be alone And love of any kind is bad A dog, a child, a cat They take up so much precious time Now where's the sense in that? Love takes the wildest heart and makes it tame If you're turned on, then just turn off Emotions are a thing all great men overcame Please, don't make this grande catastrophe Don't get attached to anyone or anything There's nothing worse than things that cling You'll go to pot You'll turn to drink You'll never rest You'll end up mad and Looking like some Poor demented dove Don't fall in love Don't fall in love
Townies: We're not safe until he's dead He'll come stalking us at night Set to sacrifice our children to his monstrous appetite He'll wreak havoc on our village if we let him wander free Gaston: So it's time to take some action, boys It's time to follow me Through the mist, through the wood Through the darkness and the shadows It's a nightmare, but it's one exciting ride Say a prayer, then we're there At the drawbridge of a castle And there's something truly terrible inside It's a beast; he's got fangs, razor-sharp ones Massive paws, killer claws for the feast Hear him roar, see him foam But we're not coming home Till he's dead, good and dead! Kill the Beast! Townies: Light your torch, mount your horse Gaston: Screw your courage to the sticking place Townies: We're counting on Gaston to lead the way Gaston: Call it war, call it threat You can bet they all will follow For in times like this they'll do just as I say Lefou: There's a beast running wild, there's no question But I fear the wrong monster's released Townies: Sally forth! Tally ho! Grab your sword, grab your bow Praise the Lord, and here we go Castleware: Hearts ablaze, banners high We go marching into battle Unafraid, although the danger's just increased Townies: Raise the flag, sing the song! Here we come, we're fifty strong And fifty Frenchmen can't be wrong Let's kill the Beast!
Belle: There's something sweet and almost kind But he was mean, and he was coarse and unrefined And now he's dear and so unsure I wonder why I didn't see it there before Beast: She glanced this way, I thought I saw And when we touched she didn't shudder at my paw No it can't be, I'll just ignore But then she's never looked at me that way before Belle: New and a bit alarming Who'd have ever thought that this could be? True that he's no Prince Charming But there's something in him that I simply didn't see Castleware: Well, who'd have thought? Well, bless my soul Well, who'd have known? Well, who indeed? And who'd have guessed they'd come together on their own? It's so peculiar Wait and see a few days more There may be something there that wasn't there before There may be something there that wasn't there before There may be something there that wasn't there before
Belle: Little town, it's a quiet village Every day like the one before Little town, full of little people Waking up to say Townies: Bonjour! Bonjour! Bonjour! Bonjour! Bonjour! Belle: There goes the baker with his tray, like always The same old bread and rolls to sell Every morning just the same Since the morning that we came To this poor, provincial town Monsieur Jean, spoken: Good Morning, Belle! Belle, spoken: Good morning, Monsieur Jean Have you lost something again? Monsieur Jean, spoken: Well, I believe I have Problem is, I've—I can't remember what Oh well, I'm sure it'll come to me Where are you off to? Belle: To return this book to Père Robert It's about two lovers in fair Verona Monsieur Jean, spoken: Sounds boring Townies: Look there she goes, that girl is strange, no question Dazed and distracted, can't you tell?e Never part of any crowde 'Cause her head's up on some cloude No denying she's a funny girl that Belle Bonjour! Good day! How is your family? Bonjour! Good day! How is your wife? I need six eggs! That's too expensive! Belle: There must be more than this provincial life! Pere Robert, spoken: Ahh, if it isn't the only bookworm in town! So, where did you run off to this week ? Belle, spoken: Two cities in Northern Italy I didn't want to come back Have you got any new places to go? Pere Robert, spoken: I'm afraid not... But you may re-read any of the old ones that you'd like Belle, spoken: Your library makes our small corner of the world feel big Pere Robert, spoken: Bon voyage! Townies: Look there she goes, the girl is so peculiar I wonder if she's feeling well With a dreamy, far-off look And her nose stuck in a book What a puzzle to the rest of us is Belle Belle: Oh, isn't this amazing? It's my favorite part because—you'll see Here's where she meets Prince Charming But she won't discover that it's him 'til Chapter Three! Townies: Now it's no wonder that her name means "Beauty" Her looks have got no parallel But behind that fair facade I'm afraid she's rather odd Very diff'rent from the rest of us She's nothing like the rest of us Yes, diff'rent from the rest of us is Belle! Gaston, spoken: Look at her, LeFou—my future wife Belle is the most beautiful girl in the village That makes her the best Lefou, spoken: But she's so... well-read! And you're so... athletically inclined Gaston, spoken: Yes... But ever since the war, I've felt like I've been missing something. And she's the only girl that gives me that sense of— Lefou, spoken: Mmm... je ne sais quoi? Gaston, spoken: I don't know what that means Gaston, sung: Right from the moment when I met her, saw her I said she's gorgeous and I fell Here in town, there's only she Who is beautiful as me So I'm making plans to woo and marry Belle Bimbettes: Look there he goes Isn't he dreamy? Monsieur Gaston Oh, he's so cute! Be still, my heart I'm hardly breathing He's such a tall, dark, strong and handsome brute! Woman 1: Bonjour! Gaston: Pardon Belle: Good day Woman 2: Mais oui! Woman 3: You call this bacon? Woman 4: What lovely flowers! Man 1: Some cheese Woman 5: Ten yards! Man 1: One pound Gaston: Excuse me Cheese Merchant: I'll get the knife Gaston: Please let me through! Woman 6: This bread Woman 7: Those fish Woman 6: It's stale! Woman 7: They smell! Men: Madame's mistaken Women: Well, maybe so Belle: There must be more than this provincial life! Gaston: Just watch, I'm going to make Belle my wife! Townies: Look there she goes That girl is strange but special A most peculiar mademoiselle! It's a pity and a sin She doesn't quite fit in 'Cause she really is a funny girl A beauty but a funny girl She really is a funny girl That Belle!
Wardrobe and Mrs. Potts: Winter turns to Spring Famine turns to feast Nature points the way Nothing left to say Beauty and the Beast Certain as the sun Rising in the East Tale as old as time Song as old as rhyme Beauty and the Beast Tale as old time Song as old as rhyme Beauty and the Beast
Lumiere: I'll be cooking again Be good-looking again With a mademoiselle on each arm When I'm human again Only human again Poised and polished and gleaming with charm I'll be courting again Chic and sporting again Mrs. Potts: Which should cause several husbands alarm Lumiere: I'll hop down off this shelf And tout de suite be myself I can't wait to be human again Castleware: When we're human again Only human again When we're knickknacks and whatnots no more When we're human again Good and human again Wardrobe: Oh, cherie, won't it all be top drawer? I'll wear lipstick and rouge And I won't be so huge Why, I'll easily fit through that door I'll exude savoir-faire I'll wear gowns; I'll have hair It's my prayer to be human again Cogsworth & Mrs. Potts: When we're human again Only human again When the world once more starts making sense Cogsworth: I'll unwind, for a change Lumiere: Really? That'd be strange Cogsworth: Can I help it if I'm t-t-tense? In a shack by the sea I'll sit back sipping tea Let my early retirement commence Far from fools made of wax I'll get down to brass tacks and relax Castleware: When I'm human again So sweep the dust from the floor Let's let some light in the room I can feel, I can tell Someone might break the spell Any day now Shine up the brass on the door Alert the dust pail and broom If it all goes as planned Our time may be at hand Any day now Open the shutters And let in some air Mrs. Potts: Put these here And put those over there Castleware: Sweep up the years The sadness and tears And throw them away We'll be human again Only human again When the girl finally sets us all free Cheeks a-blooming again We're assuming again We'll resume our long-lost joie de vivre We'll be playing again Holidaying again And we're praying it's ASAP We will push We will shove They will both fall in love And we'll finally be human again We'll be dancing again We'll be twirling again We'll be whirling around with such ease When we're human again Only human again We'll go waltzing those old one-two-threes We'll be floating again We'll be gliding again Stepping, striding, as fine as you please Like a real human does I'll be all that I was On that glorious morn When we're finally reborn And we're all human again!
There’s been a change in me A kind of moving on Though what I used to be I still depend upon For now I realize That good can come from bad That may not make me wise But oh it makes me glad And I-- I never thought I’d leave behind My childhood dreams But I don’t mind For now I love the world I see No change of heart a change in me. For in my dark despair I've slowly understood My perfect world out there Had disappeared for good But in it’s place I feel A truer life begin And it’s so good and real It must come from within And I-- I never thought I’d leave behind My childhood dreams but I don’t mind I’m where and who I want to be No change of heart A change in me No change of heart A change in me
Gaston: Lefou, I'm afraid I've been thinking Lefou: A dangerous pastime Gaston: I know But that wacky old coot is Belle's father And his sanity's only so-so Now the wheels in my head have been turning Since I looked at that loony old man See, I promised myself I'd be married to Belle And right now I'm evolving a plan Gaston & Lefou: No one plots like Gaston Gaston: Takes cheap shots like Gaston Lefou: Likes to persecute harmless crackpots like Gaston Townies: For his marriage we soon will be celebrating My, what a guy Gaston!
Belle: Little town It's a quiet village Every day Like the one before Little town full of little people Waking up to say Townies: Bonjour! Bonjour! Bonjour! Bonjour! Bonjour! Belle: There goes the baker with his tray like always The same old bread and rolls to sell Every morning just the same Since the morning that we came To this poor provincial town Townies: Look, there she goes, the girl is strange, no question Dazed and distracted, can't you tell? Never part of any crowd 'Cause her head's up on some cloud No denying she's a funny girl, that Belle Bonjour Good day How is your family? Bonjour Good day How is your wife? I need six eggs That's too expensive Belle: There must be more than this provincial life Townies: Look, there she goes That girl is so peculiar I wonder if she's feeling well With a dreamy, far-off look And her nose stuck in a book What a puzzle to the rest of us is Belle Belle: Oh, isn't this amazing? It's my favorite part because...you'll see Here's where she meets Prince Charming But she won't discover that it's him till chapter three Townies: Now, it's no wonder that her name means "beauty" Her looks have got no parallel But behind that fair facade I'm afraid she's rather odd Very different from the rest of us She's nothing like the rest of us Yes, different from the rest of us is Belle Gaston: Right from the moment when I met her, saw her I said she's gorgeous and I fell Here in town there's only she Who is beautiful as me So I'm making plans to woo and marry Belle Bimbettes: Look, there he goes Isn't he dreamy? Monsieur Gaston Oh, he's so cute Be still, my heart I'm hardly breathing He's such a tall, dark, strong and handsome brute Townies: Bonjour Gaston: Pardon Townies: Good day Mais oui You call this bacon? What lovely grapes Some cheese... Ten yards One pound Gaston: 'Scuse me Townies: I'll get the knife Gaston: Please let me through! Townies: This bread Those fish It's stale They smell Madame's mistaken Belle: There must be more than this provincial life Gaston: Just watch, I'm going to make Belle my wife! Townies: Look, there she goes, a girl who's strange but special A most peculiar mademoiselle It's a pity and a sin She doesn't quite fit in 'Cause she really is a funny girl A beauty but a funny girl She really is a funny girl, that Belle!
Gaston, spoken Who does she think she is? That girl has tangled with the wrong man! Lefou, spoken Darn right! Gaston, spoken No one says "no" to Gaston! Dismissed! Rejected! Publicly humiliated! Why, it's more than I can bear! Lefou, spoken More beer? Gaston, spoken What for? Nothing helps. I'm disgraced Lefou, spoken Who, you? Never! Gaston, you've got to pull yourself together Gosh it disturbs me to see you, Gaston Looking so down in the dumps Ev'ry guy here'd love to be you, Gaston Even when taking your lumps There's no man in town as admired as you You're ev'ryone's favorite guy Ev'ryone's awed and inspired by you And it's not very hard to see why No one's slick as Gaston No one's quick as Gaston No one's neck's as incredibly thick as Gaston's For there's no man in town half as manly Perfect, a pure paragon! You can ask any Tom, Dick or Stanley And they'll tell you whose team they prefer to be on Lefou & Chorus No one's been like Gaston A king pin like Gaston Lefou No one's got a swell cleft in his chin like Gaston Gaston As a specimen, yes, I'm intimidating Chorus My what a guy, that Gaston! Give five "hurrahs!" Give twelve "hip-hips!" Lefou Gaston is the best And the rest is all drips Chorus No one fights like Gaston Douses lights like Gaston Lefou In a wrestling match nobody bites like Gaston Bimbettes For there's no one as burly and brawny Gaston As you see, I've got biceps to spare Lefou Not a bit of him's scraggly or scrawny Gaston That's right! And every last inch of me's covered with hair Chorus No one hits like Gaston Matches wits like Gaston Lefou In a spitting match, nobody spits like Gaston Gaston I'm especially good at expectorating Ptooie! Chorus Ten points for Gaston! Gaston When I was a lad I ate four dozen eggs Ev'ry morning to help me get large And now that I'm grown I eat five dozen eggs So I'm roughly the size of a barge! Chorus Oh, ahhh, wow! My what a guy, that Gaston! No one shoots like Gaston Makes those beauts like Gaston Lefou Then goes tromping around wearing boots like Gaston Gaston I use antlers in all of my decorating Chorus My what a guy Gaston!
Belle, spoken:Can you imagine? Me, the wife of that boorish, brainless... Belle, sung:Madame Gaston Can't you just see it? Madame Gaston His little wife, ugh No, sir! Not me! I guarantee it I want much more than this provincial life! I want adventure in the great wide somewhere I want it more than I can tell And for once it might be grand To have someone understand I want so much more than they've got planned...
Lefou: Gosh, it disturbs me to see you, Gaston Looking so down in the dumps Every guy here'd love to be you, Gaston Even when taking your lumps There's no man in town as admired as you You're everyone's favorite guy Everyone's awed and inspired by you And it's not very hard to see why No one's slick as Gaston No one's quick as Gaston No one's neck's as incredibly thick as Gaston For there's no man in town half as manly Bimbettes: Perfect, a pure paragon Lefou: You can ask any Tom, Dick or Stanley And they'll tell you whose team they'd prefer to be on Who plays darts like Gaston Who breaks hearts like Gaston Who's much more than the sum of his parts, like Gaston Gaston: As a specimen, yes, I'm intimidating Townies: My, what a guy, that Gaston Gaston: I needed encouragement; thank you, Lefou Lefou: Well, there's no one as easy to bolster as you Townies: No one fights like Gaston Douses lights like Gaston Lefou: In a wrestling match nobody bites like Gaston Gaston: When I hunt I sneak up with my quiver And beasts of the field say a prayer First I carefully aim for the liver Then I shoot from behind Lefou: Is that fair? Gaston: I don't care Townies: No one hits like Gaston Matches wits like Gaston Lefou: In a spitting match, nobody spits like Gaston Gaston: I'm especially good at expectorating Townies: Ten points for Gaston! Gaston: When I was a lad I ate four dozen eggs Every morning to help me get large And now that I'm grown I eat five dozen eggs So I'm roughly the size of a barge Lefou: Who has brains like Gaston Entertains like Gaston Gaston: Who can make up these endless refrains, like Gaston I use antlers in all of my decorating Townies: Say it again Who's a man among men? Who's a super success? Don't you know? Can't you guess? Ask his fans and his five hangers-on There's just one guy in town Who's got all of it down Lefou: And his name's G-A-S-T - I believe there's another T It just occurred to me that I'm illiterate And I've never actually had to spell it out loud before Townies: Gaston!
Yes, I made the choice For Papa, I will stay But I don't deserve to lose my freedom in this way You monster! If you think that what you've done is right Well then, you're a fool Think again Is this home? Is this where I should learn to be happy? Never dreamed That a home could be dark and cold I was told Every day in my childhood Even when we grow old "Home will be where the heart is" Never were words so true My heart's far, far away Home is too Is this home? Is this what I must learn to believe in? Try to find something good In this tragic place Just in case I should stay here forever Held in this empty space Oh, but that won't be easy I know the reason why My heart's far, far away Home's a lie What I'd give To return To the life that I knew lately But I know That I can't Solve my problems going back Is this home? Am I here for a day or forever? Shut away From the world until who knows when Oh, but then As my life has been altered once It can change again Build higher walls around me Change every lock and key Nothing lasts Nothing holds all of me My heart's far, far away Home and free
Belle: There's something sweet, and almost kind But he was mean and he was coarse and unrefined And now he's dear, and so unsure I wonder why I didn't see it there before Beast: She glanced this way, I thought I saw And when we touched, she didn't shudder at my paw No, it can't be, I'll just ignore But then, she's never looked at me that way before Belle: New, and a bit alarming Who'd have ever thought that this could be? True, that he's no Prince Charming But there's something in him that I simply didn't see Fifi: Well, who'd have thought? Mrs. Potts: Well, bless my soul! Cogsworth: Well, who'd have known? Lumiere: Well, who indeed? And who'd have guessed They'd come together on their own? Mrs. Potts: It's so peculiar! Wait and see! Castleware: We'll wait and see, a few days more There may be something there that wasn't there before Cogsworth: And here's a thought Perhaps there's something there that wasn't there before Chip: What, Mama? Mrs. Potts: There may be something there that wasn't there before Chip: What is it? What's there? Mrs. Potts: I'll tell you when you're older Chip: Okay, I'm older! Mrs. Potts: Chip! Oh, you are a...
Beast You came back Belle If only I'd come here sooner Beast Maybe it's better this way Belle No! Don't talk like that We're together now. Everything will be fine Beast At least I get to see you one last time Belle We are home We are where we shall be forever Trust in me For you know I won't run away From today This is all that I need And all that I need to say is... Don't you know how you've changed me Strange how I fin'lly see I found home You're my home Stay with me No! No, please! Don't leave me! I love you Prince Belle, look into my eyes! Belle, don't you recognize The beast within the man Who's here before you? Belle It is you! Both Two lives have begun now Two hearts become one now One passion, one dream One thing forever true I love you!
LUMIÈRE, spoken Ha ha, oui, my friends, the day we have waited for may be at hand.​ MRS. POTTS, spoken Oh, if only that were true, Lumiere.​ LUMIÈRE, spoken Aah, human again.​ MRS. POTTS, spoken Human again.​ LUMIÈRE, spoken Yes, think what that means.​ I'll be cooking again, be good-looking again With a mademoiselle on each arm When I'm human again, only human again Poised and polished and gleaming with charm I'll be courting again, chic and sporting again MRS. POTTS Which should cause several husbands alarm! CHIP I'll hop down off the shelf LUMIÈRE & MRS. POTTS And tout de suite be myself CHIP I can't wait to be human again MRS. POTTS & Chorus When we're human again, only human again When we're knickknacks and whatnot's no more CHIP Little push, little shove They could, whoosh, fall in love MADAME DE LA GRANDE BOUCHE Ah chérie, won't it all be top-drawer? I'll wear lipstick and rouge and I won't be so huge Why, I'll easily fit through that door I'll exude savior-faire, I'll wear gowns, I'll have hair It's my prayer to be human again COGSWORTH When I'm human again, only human again When the world once more starts making sense I'll unwind for a change LUMIÈRE, spoken Really? That'd be strange COGSWORTH, spoken Can I help it if I'm t-t-tense? In a shack by the sea, I'll sit back sipping tea Let my early retirement commence Far from fools made of wax, I'll get down to brass tacks and relax COMPANY When I'm human again So sweep the dust from the floor Let's let some light in the room I can feel, I can tell Someone might break the spell any day now LUMIÈRE Shine up the brass on the door FEATHERDUSTER Alert the dustpail and broom COMPANY If it all goes as planned Our time may be at hand any day now Open the shutters and let in some air MRS. POTTS Put these here and put those over there COMPANY Sweep up the years of sadness and tears And throw them away BELLE, spoken When Guinevere heard that Arthur was slain She stole away to a convent And no one could ever make her smile again The end BEAST, spoken What a beautiful story! BELLE, spoken Oh, I knew you would like it.​ I would like to ask you for something.​ BEAST, spoken What's that? BELLE, spoken A second chance.​ Would you have dinner with me tonight? BEAST, spoken Dinner? Me? With you? Well, that would be, I mean—oh, yes! COMPANY When we're human again, only human again When the girl finally sets us all free Cheeks a-bloomin' again, we're assumin' again We'll resume our long lost joie de vivre We'll be playin' again, holiday'n again And we're prayin' it's ASAP When we cast off this pall We'll stand straight, we'll walk tall When we're all that we were Thanks to him, thanks to her Coming closer and closer and closer Closer and closer and— We'll be dancing again, we'll be twirling again We'll be whirling around with such ease When we're human again, only human again We'll go waltzing those old one-two-three's We'll be floating again, we'll be gliding again Stepping, striding, as fine as you please Like a real human does, I'll be all that I was On that glorious morn' when we're finally reborn And we're all of us human again!
Belle: There is more to this time of year Than sleigh bells and holly Mistletoe and snow Those things come and go Much deeper than snow Stronger than the strongest love we'll know We'll ever know As long as there's Christmas I truly believe That hope is the greatest of the gifts we'll receive As long as there's Christmas we'll all be just fine A star shines above us lighting your Way and mine Cogsworth: Just as long as there's Christmas There will be Christmas pud Tons of turkey Mrs. Potts: And cranb'ry sauce And mince pies if we're good Lumiere: Loads of logs on the fire Castleware: Lots of gifts on the tree All wrapped up in red ribbons Chip: Wonder if there's one for me Cogsworth: We're due for a party> Where on earth do we start? Fifi: I may wear my tiara You bought me in Monmartre Cogsworth: All the silver will sparkle Mrs. Potts: And the china will gleam Lumiere: And we'll all be as shiny As a brand-new centime Chip: After dinner we'll play games Mrs. Potts: Till the morning breaks through Lumiere: Then we'll meet in the garden This is what we shall do Chip: We will build us a snowman That will reach to the sky Belle: It will stay up until July Belle & Castleware: As long as there's Christmas I truly believe That hope is the greatest of the gifts we'll receive As long as there's Christmas we'll all be just fine Belle: There'll always be Christmas So there always will be a time When the world is filled with peace and love
BEAST How long must this go on? This cruel trick of fate? I simply made one careless wrong decision And then that witch was gone And left me in this state An object of revulsion and derision Hated Is there no one? Who can show me How to win the world's forgiveness?
Gaston Crazy old Maurice, hmmm? Crazy old Maurice... LeFou, I'm afraid I've been thinking Lefou A dangerous pastime Gaston I know But that wacky old coot is Belle's father And his sanity's only "so-so" Now the wheels in my head have been turning Since I looked at that loony, old man See, I've promised myself I'd be married to Belle And right now I'm evolving a plan Gaston If I . . . (whisper) Lefou Yes? Gaston Then we . . . (whisper) Lefou No! Would she . Gaston (whisper) Guess! Lefou Now I get it! Both Let's go! No one plots like Gaston Gaston Takes cheap shots like Gaston Lefou Plans to persecute harmless crackpots like Gaston Gaston Yes, I'm endlessly, wildly resourceful Lefou As down to the depths you descend Gaston I won't even be mildly remorseful Lefou Just as long as I (you) get what I (you) want in the end Gaston Who has brains like Gaston? Lefou Entertains like Gaston? Both Who can make up these endless refrains like Gaston? And his marriage we soon will be celebrating My, what a guy Gaston!
BELLE Little town, it's a quiet village Every day, like the one before Little town, full of little people Waking up to say TOWNSFOLK Bonjour! Bonjour! Bonjour! Bonjour! Bonjour! BELLE There goes the baker with his tray, like always The same old bread and rolls to sell Every morning just the same Since the morning that we came To this poor provincial town BAKER, spoken Good morning, Belle! BELLE, spoken Oh, good morning, Monsieur BAKER, spoken And where are you off to today? BELLE, spoken The bookshop I just finished the mot wonderful story About a beanstalk and an ogre and a— BAKER, spoken That's nice. Marie! The baguettes! Hurry up! TOWNSFOLK Look there she goes, that girl is strange, no question Dazed and distracted, can't you tell? WOMAN Never part of any crowd MAN 'Cause her head's upon some cloud TOWNSFOLK No denying she's a funny girl that Belle MAN 1 Bonjour! WOMAN 1 Good day! MAN 1 How is your family? WOMAN 2 Bonjour! MAN 2 Good day! WOMAN 2 How is your wife? WOMAN 3 I need six eggs! WOMAN 4 That's too expensive! BELLE There must be more than this provincial life BOOKSELLER, spoken Ah, Belle BELLE, spoken Good morning! I've come to return the book I borrowed BOOKSELLER, spoken Finished already? BELLE, spoken Oh, I couldn't put it down. Have you got anything new? BOOKSELLER, spoken Not since yesterday BELLE, spoken That's alright. I'll borrow this one BOOKSELLER, spoken That one? But you've read it twice! BELLE, spoken Well, it's my favorite! Far off places, daring sword fights, magic spells, a prince in disguise BOOKSELLER, spoken If you like it all that much, it's yours BELLE, spoken But sir! BOOKSELLER, spoken I insist! BELLE, spoken Thank you, thank you very much! TOWNSFOLK Look there she goes, the girl is so peculiar I wonder if she's feeling well With a dreamy, far-off look And her nose stuck in a book What a puzzle to the rest of us is Belle BELLE Oh, isn't this amazing? It's my favorite part because—you'll see Here's where she meets Prince Charming But she won't discover that it's him 'til Chapter Three! WOMAN Now it's no wonder that her name means "Beauty" Her looks have got no parallel SHOPKEEPER But behind that fair facade I'm afraid she's rather odd MAN Very different from the rest of us TOWNSFOLK She's nothing like the rest of us Yes, different from the rest of us is Belle! LEFOU, spoken I got it, Gaston! Aw... Wow! You didn't miss a shot, Gaston! You're the greatest hunter in the whole world! GASTON, spoken I know LEFOU, spoken No beast alive stands a chance against you And no girl, for that matter GASTON, spoken It's true, LeFou. And I've got my sights set on that one LEFOU, spoken The inventor's daughter? GASTON, spoken She's the one—the lucky girl I'm going to marry LEFOU, spoken But she's— GASTON, spoken The most beautiful girl in town LEFOU, spoken I know but— GASTON, spoken That makes her the best And don't I deserve the best? LEFOU, spoken Of course you do! GASTON Right from the moment when I met her, saw her I said, "She's gorgeous," and I fell Here in town there's only she Who is beautiful as me So I'm making plans to woo and marry Belle Bimbettes Look there he goes Isn't he dreamy? Monsieur Gaston Oh, he's so cute! Be still my heart I'm hardly breathing He's such a tall, dark, strong and handsome brute! WOMAN Bonjour GASTON Pardon BELLE Good day WOMAN Mais oui! WOMAN You call this bacon? WOMAN What lovely grapes MAN Some cheese WOMAN Ten yards! MAN One pound GASTON 'Scuse me! CHEESE MERCHANT I'll get the knife GASTON Please let me through WOMAN This bread— WOMAN Those fish— WOMAN It's stale! WOMAN They smell! MAN Madame's mistaken WOMAN Well maybe so TOWNSFOLK Good morning! Oh, good morning! BELLE There must be more than this provincial life! GASTON Just watch, I'm going to make Belle my wife! TOWNSFOLK Look there she goes The girl is strange but special A most peculiar mademoiselle! WOMAN It's a pity and a sin MAN She doesn't quite fit in TOWNSFOLK 'Cause she really is a funny girl A beauty but a funny girl She really is a funny girl That Belle!
Maurice: How does a moment last forever How can a story never die It is love we must hold onto Never easy, but we try Sometimes our happiness is captured Somehow our time and place stand still Love lives on inside our hearts And always will
Lefou: Gosh, it disturbs me to see you, Gaston Looking so down in the dumps Every guy here'd love to be you, Gaston There's no man in town as admired as you You're everyone's favorite guy Everyone's awed and inspired by you And it's not very hard to see why No one's slick as Gaston No one's quick as Gaston No one's neck's as incredibly thick as Gaston For there's no man in town half as manly Perfect, a pure paragon You can ask any Tom, Dick or Stanley And they'll tell you whose team they'd prefer to be on Townies: No one's been like Gaston A kingpin like Gaston Lefou: No one's got a swell cleft in his chin like Gaston Gaston: As a specimen, yes, I'm intimidating Townies: My, what a guy, that Gaston Give five "hurrahs!" Give twelve "hip-hips!" Lefou: Gaston is the best And the rest is all drips Townies: No one fights like Gaston Douses lights like Gaston In a wrestling match nobody bites like Gaston Bimbettes: For there's no one as burly and brawny Gaston: As you see, I've got biceps to spare Lefou: Not a bit of him's scraggly or scrawny Gaston: And every last inch of me's covered with hair Townies: No one hits like Gaston Matches wits like Gaston Lefou: In a spitting match, nobody spits like Gaston Gaston: I'm especially good at expectorating Townies: Ten points for Gaston! Gaston: When I was a lad I ate four dozen eggs Every morning to help me get large And now that I'm grown I eat five dozen eggs So I'm roughly the size of a barge Townies: No one shoots like Gaston Makes those beauts like Gaston Lefou: Then goes tromping around wearing boots like Gaston Gaston: I use antlers in all of my decorating Townies: My, what a guy Gaston!
Mrs. Potts Tale as old as time True as it can be Barely even friends Then somebody bends Unexpectedly Just a little change Small to say the least Both a little scared Neither one prepared Beauty and the Beast Belle, spoken Dance with me? Beast, spoken No, I... Lumiere &amp; Cogsworth, spoken Dance with her! Mrs. Potts Ever just the same Ever a surprise Ever as before And ever just as sure As the sun will rise Tale as old as time Tune as old as song Bittersweet and strange Finding you can change Learning you were wrong Certain as the sun Rising in the east Tale as old as time Song as old as rhyme Beauty and the Beast Tale as old as time Song as old as rhyme Beauty and the Beast (spoken) Off to the cupboard with you now, Chip It's past your bedtime. Good night, love.​
BELLE, spoken Is he gone? Oh, can you imagine? He asked me to marry him Me, the wife of that boorish, brainless (sung) "Madame Gaston!" Can't you just see it? "Madame Gaston!" His "little wife", ugh! No sir! Not me! I guarantee it! I want much more than this provincial life! I want adventure in the great wide somewhere I want it more than I can tell And for once it might be grand To have someone understand I want so much more than they've got planned
Belle: This is the Paris of my childhood These were the borders of my life In this crumbling, dusty attic Where an artist loved his wife Easy to remember Harder to move on Knowing the Paris of my childhood Is gone
Young Prince: Days in the sun When my life has barely begun Not until my whole life is done Will I ever leave you Cadenza: Will I tremble again To my dear one's gorgeous refrain Lumiere & Fifi: Will you now forever remain Out of reach of my arms Mrs. Potts: Oh, those days in the sun What I'd give to relive just one Undo what's done And bring back the light Wardrobe: Oh, I could sing Of the pain these dark days bring The spell we're under Still it's the wonder of us I sing of tonight Belle: How in the midst of all this sorrow Can so much hope and love endure I was innocent and certain Now I'm wiser but unsure I can't go back into my childhood Wardrobe: All those precious days... Belle: One that my father made secure Wardrobe: ...couldn't last Belle: I can feel a change in me I'm stronger now but still not free All: Days in the sun Will return, we must believe As lovers do That days in the sun will come shining through
Belle: When I get to know him We'll find more things to say One day I will reach him There has to be a way Everyone needs someone He must need someone, too When I get to know him better Here's what I will do I'll read him stories From picture books All filled with wonder Magic worlds where The impossible Becomes the everyday We'll find a mountaintop And some moonbeams To sit under I'll lead because I know the way So much to discover I do it all the time I could live inside bright pages Where the words all rhyme We will slay the dragons That still follow him around And he'll smile, yes he'll smile As his dreams leave the ground Stories and stories 'Bout mermaids, kings And sunken treasure> Magic worlds where the impossible Becomes the everyday I know a tiny place Just a dot, too small to measure I'll take him there I know the way Stories 'bout heroes Who overcame their deepest sorrow They'll put hope into his heart again He'll cherish every day He'll find a better world And the strength to face tomorrow I'm sure that when he knows the way He'll want to stay
MAURICE First prize is nearly mine It's quite my best invention So simple, yet complex; So massive, yet so small This triumph of design Will be my old-age pension That is, provided I can find the fair at all I must have missed a sign I should have paid attention Drat! That's not a nightingale, and not a mating call Wolves!
Belle: Madame Gaston Can't you just see it Madame Gaston, his little wife No sir, not me I guarantee it I want so much more than this provincial life I want adventure in the great wide somewhere I want it more than I can tell And for once it might be grand To have someone understand I want so much more than they've got planned
Cheer up, child It will turn out alright in the end, you'll see I hope that we'll be friends Though I don't know you well If anyone can make The most of living here Then, Belle, it's you And who knows? You may find home here, too!
Wardrobe: Oh, how divine Glamour, music and magic combine See the maidens so anxious to shine Look for a sign that enhances chances She'll be his special one What a display What a breathtaking, thrilling array Every prince, every dog has his day Let us sing with passion, gusto, fit to bust Oh, not a care in the world!
There are times I think That no one seems to listen There are times I think they listen But don't hear There are times I think they hear But something's missing The thoughts behind the words aren't clear So, I think they're saying something they're not saying They think I mean something I don't mean at all Do we raise our voice miscommunicating? Or simply say nothing at all Is there another way to say it In a way that can be heard? Let me see if I can put it into words I can hear you, you can hear me When we listen with our hearts I understand you, you understand me That's the place where we can start Words of kindness and forgiveness Bring us closer, not apart When we speak our minds And listen with our hearts I can hear you, you can hear me When we listen with our hearts I understand you, you understand me That's the place where we can start Words of kindness and forgiveness Bring us closer, not apart When we speak our minds And listen with our hearts And listen with our hearts.
Did you ever wonder what it's like To wonder from a different point of view? To try and see life differently While doing what somebody else might do? Imagine seeing through a set of different eyes You just might be surprised You just might realize That somebody might be wondering And wonder what it's like to be like you A little thought A little care A little "when you ever need me, I'll be there" A little give A little take A little "it's ok to make a small mistake" A little time A little space A little chance to help somebody find their place It isn't much, but it means a lot It's not a little thing to have a little thought A little thought A little care A little "when you ever need me, I'll be there" A little give A little take A little "it's ok to make a small mistake" A little time A little space A little chance to help somebody find their place It isn't much, but it means a lot It's not a little thing to have a little thought.
Beast No spell has been broken No words have been spoken No point anymore if she can't love me No hope she would do so No dream to pursue, so I looked to myself, despise all the things I see For I know that she Cannot set me free Let the world be done with me
Mrs. Potts:Tale as old as time True as it can be Barely even friends Then somebody bends Unexpectedly Just a little change Small to say the least Both a little scared Neither one prepared Beauty and the Beast Ever just the same Ever a surprise Ever as before Ever just as sure As the sun will rise Tale as old as time Tune as old as song Bittersweet and strange Finding you can change Learning you were wrong Certain as the sun Rising in the east Tale as old as time Song as old as rhyme Beauty and the Beast Tale as old as time Song as old as rhyme Beauty and the Beast
Lumiere: Be our guest Be our guest Put our service to the test Tie your napkin round your neck, cherie And we provide the rest Soupe du jour Hot hors d'oeuvres Why, we only live to serve Try the grey stuff, it's delicious Don't believe me, ask the dishes They can sing They can dance After all, miss, this is France And a dinner here is never second best Go on, unfold your menu Take a glance and then You'll be our guest Oui, our guest Be our guest Castleware: Beef ragout Cheese soufflé Pie and pudding en flambé Lumiere: We'll prepare and serve with flair A culinary cabaret You're alone And you're scared But the banquet's all prepared No one's gloomy or complaining While the flatware's entertaining We tell jokes I do tricks With my fellow candlesticks Beer Mugs: But it's all in perfect taste, that you can bet Castleware: Come on and lift your glass You've won your own free pass To be our guest Lumiere: If you're stressed It's fine dining we suggest Castleware: Be our guest Be our guest Be our guest Lumiere: Life is so unnerving For a servant who's not serving He's not whole without a soul to wait upon Ah, those good old days when we were useful Suddenly, those good old days are gone Ten years we've been rusting Needing so much more than dusting Needing exercise, a chance to use our skills Most days we just lay around the castle Flabby, fat and lazy You walked in and oops-a-daisy! Mrs. Potts: It's a guest! It's a guest! Sakes alive, well, I'll be blessed Wine's been poured, and thank the lord I've had the napkins freshly pressed With dessert She'll want tea And, my dear, that's fine with me While the cups do their soft-shoeing I'll be bubbling, I'll be brewing I'll get warm Piping hot Heaven's sake, is that a spot? Clean it up, we want the company impressed We've got a lot to do Is it one lump or two? For you, our guest Castleware: She's our guest Mrs. Potts: She's our guest Castleware: She's our guest Be our guest Be our guest Put our service to the test It's ten years since we've had anybody here And we're obsessed With your meal With your ease Yes, indeed, we aim to please While the candlelight's still glowing Let us help you, we'll keep going Course by course One by one Till you shout, "Enough, I'm done!" Then we'll sing you off to sleep as you digest Tonight you'll prop your feet up But for now, let's eat up Be our guest Be our guest Be our guest Please be our guest!
Townies: We're not safe until he's dead He'll come stalking us at night Set to sacrifice our children to his monstrous appetite He'll wreak havoc on our village if we let him wander free Gaston: So it's time to take some action, boys It's time to follow me Townies:Through the mist, through the woods Through the darkness and the shadows It's a nightmare, but it's one exciting ride Say a prayer, then we're there At the drawbridge of a castle And there's something truly terrible inside It's a beast; he's got fangs, razor-sharp ones Massive paws, killer claws for the feast Hear him roar, see him foam But we're not coming home Till he's dead, good and dead! Kill the Beast! Light your torch, mount your horse Gaston: Screw your courage to the sticking place Townies: We're counting on Gaston to lead the way Through the mist, through the wood Where within a haunted castle Something's lurking that you don't see every day It's a beast, one as tall as a mountain We won't rest till he's good and deceased Sally forth! Tally ho! Grab your sword! Grab your bow! Praise the Lord and here we go! We don't like what we don't understand In fact, it scares us And this monster is mysterious at least Bring your guns! Bring your knives! Save your children and your wives We'll save our village and our lives We'll kill the Beast! Castleware: Hearts ablaze, banners high We go marching into battle Unafraid, although the danger just increased Townies: Raise the flag! Sing the song! Here we come, we're fifty strong And fifty Frenchmen can't be wrong Let's kill the Beast!
Lumiere, spoken: Ma chère Mademoiselle, it is with deepest pride and greatest pleasure that we welcome you tonight. And now, we invite you to relax. Let us pull up a chair, as the dining room proudly presents... your dinner Lumiere, sung: Be our guest! Be our guest Put our service to the test Tie your napkin 'round your neck, cherie And we'll provide the rest Soup du jour Hot hors d'oeuvres Why, we only live to serve Try the grey stuff, it's delicious Don't believe me? Ask the dishes They can sing, they can dance After all, Miss, this is France And a dinner here is never second best Go on, unfold your menu Take a glance and then you'll Be our guest Oui, our guest Be our guest! Beef ragout Cheese soufflé Pie and pudding, en flambé We'll prepare and serve with flair A culinary cabaret! You're alone And you're scared But the banquet's all prepared No one's gloomy or complaining While the flatware's entertaining We tell jokes! I do tricks With my fellow candlesticks! Castleware: And it's all in perfect taste That you can bet Lumiere: Come on and lift your glass You've won your own free pass To be our guest If you're stressed It's fine dining we suggest Be our guest! Castleware: Be our guest! Be our guest! Lumiere: Life is so unnerving For a servant who's not serving He's not whole without a soul to wait upon Ah, those good old days when we were useful —Eh, Cogsworth? Suddenly those good old days are gone Too long, we've been rusting Needing so much more than dusting Needing exercise, a chance to use our skills Most days, we just lay around the castle Flabby, fat, and lazy You walked in and oops-a-daisy Mrs. Potts: It's a guest! It's a guest! Sake's alive, well I'll be blessed! Wine's been poured and thank the Lord I've had the napkins freshly pressed With dessert, she'll want tea And my dear, that's fine with me While the cups do their soft-shoein' I'll be bubbling, I'll be brewing I'll get warm, piping hot Heaven's sakes! Is that a spot? Clean it up! We want the company impressed! We've got a lot to do Is it one lump or two? For you, our guest! Castleware: She's our guest! Mrs. Potts: She's our guest! Castleware: She's our guest! Castleware: Be our guest! Be our guest! Our command is your request It's been years since we've had anybody here And we're obsessed Castleware: With your meal, with your ease Yes, indeed, we aim to please While the candlelight's still glowing Let us help you, we'll keep going Course by course, one by one 'Til you shout, "Enough! I'm done!" Then we'll sing you off to sleep as you digest Tonight, you'll prop your feet up But for now, let's eat up Be our guest! Be our guest! Be our guest! Please, be our guest!
BEAST And in my twisted face There's not the slightest trace Of anything that even hints of kindness And from my tortured shape No comfort, no escape I see, but deep within is utter blindness Hopeless As my dream dies As the time flies Love, a lost illusion Helpless Unforgiven Cold and driven To this sad conclusion No beauty could move me No goodness improve me No power on earth If I can't love her No passion could reach me No lesson could teach me How I could have loved her And make her love me too If I can't love her, then who? Long ago I should have seen All the things I could have been Careless and unthinking, I moved onward No pain could be deeper No life could be cheaper No point anymore If I can't love her No spirit could win me No hope left within me Hope I could have loved her And that she'd set me free But it's not to be If I can't love her Let the world be done with me
Angelique: When I felt lost and lonely Not a dream in my head Your words lifted my spirits I remember what you said Angelique: As long as there's Christmas I truly believe Angelique & Belle: That hope is the greatest of the gifts we'll receive As long as our guiding star shines above Angelique: There will always be Christmas Belle: So there always will be a time When the world is filled with peace and love
Beast: I was the one who had it all I was the master of my fate I never needed anybody in my life I learned the truth too late I'll never shake away the pain I close my eyes, but she's still there I let her steal into my melancholy heart It's more than I can bear Now I know she'll never leave me Even as she runs away She will still torment me, calm me, hurt me Move me, come what may Wasting in my lonely tower Waiting by an open door I'll fool myself she'll walk right in And be with me for evermore I rage against the trials of love I curse the fading of the light Though she's already flown so far beyond my reach She's never out of sight Now I know she'll never leave me Even as she fades from view She will still inpire me, be a part of Everything I do Wasting in my lonely tower Waiting by an open door I'll fool myself she'll walk right in And as the long, long nights begin I'll think of all that might have been Waiting here for evermore!
Belle, spoken Show me the Beast! Maurice, spoken That's him! That's him! Woman, spoken Is it dangerous? Belle, spoken Oh, no. No, he'd never hurt anyone. I know he looks Frightful, but he's really very gentle and kind. He's my friend Gaston, spoken If I didn't know better, I'd think you had feelings for this monster Belle, spoken He's no monster, Gaston. You are! Gaston, spoken She's as crazy as the old man. She says this creature is her friend Well, I've hunted wild beasts and I've seen what they can do The Beast will make off with your children! He'll come after them in the night Belle, spoken No, he will never! Gaston, spoken Forget the old man, I say we kill the Beast! Mob, spoken Kill him! Man We're not safe until he's dead Man He'll come stalking us at night Woman Set to sacrifice our children to his monstrous appetite D'Arque He'll wreak havoc on our village if we let him wander free Gaston So it's time to take some action, boys It's time to follow me Through the mist Through the woods Through the darkness and the shadows It's a nightmare but it's one exciting ride Say a prayer Then we're there At the drawbridge of a castle And there's something truly terrible inside It's a beast He's got fangs Razor sharp ones Massive paws Killer claws for the feast Hear him roar See him foam But we're not coming home 'Til he's dead Good and dead! Kill the Beast! Belle, spoken No! I won't let you do this! Gaston, spoken Try and stop us! Belle, spoken Papa, this is all my fault. I have to go back and warn him Maurice, spoken I'm coming with you Belle, spoken No! Maurice, spoken I lost you once, I won't lose you again! Belle, spoken Then we'd better hurry Gaston, spoken We'll rid the village of this Beast. Who's with me? Mob, spoken I am! I am! I am! Mob Light your torch Mount your horse! Gaston Screw your courage to the sticking place! Mob We're counting on Gaston to lead the way! Through a mist Through a wood Where within a haunted castle Something's lurking that you don't see ev'ry day! It's a beast One as tall as a mountain We won't rest 'Til he's good and deceased Sally forth! Tally ho! Grab your sword! Grab your bow! Praise the Lord and here we go! We don't like What we don't understand In fact it scares us And this monster is mysterious at least Bring your guns! Bring your knives! Save your children and your wives We'll save our village and our lives We'll kill the Beast! Gaston, spoken Cut down a tree, and make it a big one! Take whatever Booty you can find. But remember, the Beast is MINE! Mob Hearts ablaze Banners high We go marching into battle Unafraid although the danger just increased Raise the flag! Sing the song! Here we come, we're fifty strong And fifty Frenchmen can't be wrong Let's kill the Beast! Kill the Beast! Kill the Beast Kill the Beast!
LUMIERE Ma chere Mademoiselle, it is with deepest pride And greatest pleasure that we welcome you here tonight And now we invite you to relax, let us pull up a Chair as the dining room proudly presents - Your dinner! Be our guest! Be our guest! Put our service to the test Tie your napkin 'round your neck, cherie And we provide the rest Soup du jour Hot hors d'oeuvres We only live to serve Try the grey stuff CHIP Oh, it's delicious LUMIERE Don't believe me? Ask the dishes They can sing, they can dance After all, Miss, this is France And a dinner here is never second best Go on, unfold your menu Take a glance and then you'll Be our guest Oui, our guest Be our guest! LUMIERE & ALL Beef ragout Cheese souffle Pie and pudding "en flambe" LUMIERE We'll prepare and serve with flair A culinary cabaret! You're alone And you're scared But the banquet's all prepared No one's gloomy or complaining While the flatware's entertaining We tell jokes! I do tricks With my fellow candlesticks ALL And it's all in perfect taste That you can bet Come on and lift your glass You've won your own free pass To be our guest LUMIERE If you're stressed It's fine dining we suggest ALL Be our guest! Be our guest! Be our guest! Be our guest! Be our guest! Be our guest! Get your worries off your chest Let us say for your entree We've an array; may we suggest: Try the bread! Try the soup! When the croutons loop de loop It's a treat for any diner Don't believe me? Ask the china Singing pork! Dancing veal! What an entertaining meal! How could anyone be gloomy and depressed? We'll make you shout "encore!" And send us out for more So, be our guest! LUMIERE Be our guest! ALL Be our guest! MRS. POTTS It's a guest! It's a guest! Sakes alive, well I'll be blessed! Wine's been poured and thank the Lord I've had the napkins freshly pressed With dessert, she'll want tea And my dear that's fine with me While the cups do their soft-shoein' I'll be bubbling, I'll be brewing I'll get warm, piping hot Heaven's sakes! Is that a spot? Clean it up! We want the company impressed ALL We've got a lot to do! MRS. POTTS Is it one lump or two? For you, our guest! ALL She's our guest! MRS. POTTS She's our guest! ALL She's our guest! Be our guest! Be our guest! Be our guest! LUMIERE Life is so unnerving For a servant who's not serving He's not whole without a soul to wait upon Ah, those good old days when we were useful... Suddenly those good old days are gone Ten years we've been rusting Needing so much more than dusting Needing exercise, a chance to use our skills! Most days we just lay around the castle Flabby, fat and lazy You walked in and oops-a-daisy! COGSWORTH, spoken Lumiere! Think of what the master will do if he finds out about this! LUMIERE And now, for you continued dining experience: Napkins! S'il vous plait! NAPKINS Oh la la! Un, deux, trois, quatre, cinq, six, sept, wheee! ALL Be our guest! Be our guest! Our command is your request It's been years since we've had anybody here And we're obsessed With your meal, with your ease Yes, indeed, we aim to please While the candlelight's still glowing Let us help you, We'll keep going Course by course, one by one 'Til you shout, "Enough! I'm done!" Then we'll sing you off to sleep as you digest Tonight you'll prop your feet up But for now, let's eat up Be our guest! Be our guest! Be our guest! Please, be our guest!